Pidgin and Finch: The Pimpin' Penguin IM Clients That're Good for the Soul

Our development blog is available at: http://planet.pidgin.im

2.7.9 (12/26/2010):
	John: Just a quick release for a security fix here.  Elliott has not
	yet had a chance to work on the MSN breakage that's been present in
	the last couple releases, but we hope he can do it before 2.7.10!

2.7.8 (12/19/2010):
	Elliott: OK, so I know a few things broke with the last release, and
	it's too bad we had to rush it for that silly certificate thing that
	the MSN people can't configure properly.  I've certainly done a lot of
	small fixes this time, but it's too bad we haven't been able to get the
	transfers with the official client fixed yet.  I promise it'll be in
	the next release (barring any quick security issues).

	John: So, it's been about a month since we last released.  Again, we've
	assembled a bugfix release for your enjoyment.  While a few commonly
	reported bugs remain, particularly in MSN, we're working on it for the
	next release.  In the meantime, Merry Christmas and enjoy!

2.7.7 (11/23/2010):
	John: Well, this time around, we should finally have the certificate
	issue really and fully fixed for all of you MSN users.  Also, we have
	a few AIM-related fixes in this release, most notably the fix for the
	new "SSL Handshake Failure" message some of you got after upgrading.
	That one was an oversight on our part.  Enjoy the fixes!

2.7.6 (11/21/2010):
	Jorge: In this release I have merged two branches where I have spent
	most of my time in the last months, the MSNP16 and SLP-rewrite.  I 
	hope you all will enjoy the hability to be connected on multiple
	instances at the same time. I also hope that the SLP rewrite
	fix a lot of old bugs that we have in the tracker. I am really 
	happy with this rewrite because there was untoched code from almost
	5 years ago. I hope you like this release!

	John: In this release, we give you some new features and a bunch of
	bug fixes.  This includes shipping intermediate certificates to fix
	certificate validation for MSN's servers.  Upgrade and enjoy!

2.7.5 (10/31/2010):
	John: A bugfix release for all of you!  This time we fixed a bunch of
	bugs ranging from annoying regressions to long-standing bugs we didn't
	realize until now were bugs.  Enjoy!

2.7.4 (10/20/2010):
	John: This release came at this particular time due to some security
	issues Daniel discovered for us when investigating a bug.  There are
	a ton of other changes, including some partial Yahoo file transfer
	fixes and a bunch of other little things.  Enjoy!

2.7.3 (08/10/2010):
	Mark: Lots of little incremental[1] bug fixes and enhancements in this
	release.

	[1] No whales were harmed[2] during the creation of this release.
	[2] Probably.

	John: Finally got some fixes out there for you Yahoo users behind some
	particularly annoying firewalls and proxies, among other fixes.  Enjoy!

2.7.2 (07/21/2010):
	Mark: We discovered a security issue in Pidgin 2.7.0 and 2.7.1 and
	decided to release a patched version quickly.  This release contains
	the fix for that crash, and a few other minor fixes.

2.7.1 (05/29/2010):
	Elliott: Hey, I'm first!  How did that happen?!  Maybe because of the
	interesting changes in this release.  Sure there were quite a few bug
	fixes, but I know what you've all been waiting for is the direct
	connections in MSN.  Trust me, it's really really fast!!

	John: Whoa, short turnaround for us.  This is just 17 days after our
	previous release!  This fixes a number of bugs that you've all been
	reporting a ton of duplicate tickets about and even gives you the new
	direct connection file transfer support for MSN.  Enjoy!

	Marcus: Quite a bit quicker to get this release out, compared with the
	previous one :).  Fixes a number of bugs, and I'm sure the MSN direct
	connections will please many users.  Enjoy!

2.7.0 (05/12/2010):
	John: We FINALLY got the ICQ X-Status stuff merged in!  And a few other
	patches that have been sitting on Trac forever.  Couple that with some
	new features and we have an excellent release for all of you!

	Marcus: Finally time for a new release, seems like it took
	quite a while this time.  But then again, there are some new features
	in there, like file transfer preview (thumbnails) support (only on MSN
	so far), plus a lot of bug fixes.  Enjoy!

	Paul: Yay, a new release!  I don't think I added very much useful to
	this release, other than fixing a paste bug from Chrome (no weird
	characters appended to the end of your URI).  Enjoy!

	Jorge: This is my first NEWS!  I'm not sure I added something nice
	to this release.  I know it took a lot of time to bring this one
	out, however I'm really excited by this release.  I hope everyone
	likes the new features this release brings.

	Elliott: This release took so long, I had to go check the ChangeLog
	just to see what happened.  I doubt many people will notice, but we
	dropped support for many old things, like GTK+<2.10 and MSNP9.  In more
	exciting news, we have file transfer previews on MSN, and support for
	setting moods on ICQ and XMPP (which has been waiting forever.)

2.6.6 (02/18/2010):
	Mark: This release includes some great little changes and fixes a few
	security-related bugs.  See the ChangeLog for details.

2.6.5 (01/08/2010):
	Paul: This release fixes a pretty serious bug in the MSN code, so we're
	releasing this build a little earlier than planned with only major
	bugs fixed.  See the ChangeLog for details.  Enjoy!

2.6.4 (11/29/2009):
	John:  It's release time again.  Lots of bug fixes this time around, as
	well as a new protocol plugin developed and maintained by the MXit folks
	folks.  Elliott and I also did a ton of work on the Preferences window,
	which will now hopefully fit on most people's small screens.  Enjoy!

	Elliott: This release has been in the works for so long, I don't really
	remember doing any work on it.  But I do know the MSN servers gave us a
	little bit of trouble this time around, forgetting people's friendly
	names.  Nothing too problematic, just a touch annoying.  Also, we've got
	a nice new Preferences dialog.  You can thank John for that mostly, with
	a couple of tweaks by me.

	Sadrul: A lot of little fixes for a lot of things! Among them, a fix
	for a long standing issue with displaying unicode in non-utf8 locale in
	finch. We also have a new prpl for MXit. This release is very very cool
	altogether. Enjoy!

2.6.3 (10/16/2009):
	Mark: Someone reported a fairly serious bug in our AIM/ICQ code
	so we're releasing a special "severe bug fix only" build.  See the
	ChangeLog for details.  Enjoy!

2.6.2 (09/05/2009):
	Mark: Woo boy it's been a busy two weeks.  There was a lot of new code
	in 2.6.0, and with new code comes new bugs.  The cadre of relentless
	developers responsible for Pidgin have been hard at work, and I believe
	they have fixed all the major bugs that cropped up.  My thanks to all
	those names listed as Current Developers in Pidgin's 'About' window.

	Elliott: Well now, just as Mark said, there was a lot of new stuff that
	probably came up with tons of bugs.  So I can't say I wrote anything
	super-awesome, but I definitely fixed quite a few of those itty-bitty
	why-didn't-this-work-this-way sort of bugs.

2.6.1 (08/18/2009):
	Mark: There were a lot of changes in 2.6.0, and so a few major bugs
	crept in.  This is a very minor release to fix those bugs.  Sorry for
	the inconvenience!

2.6.0 (08/18/2009):
	John:  Wow, four straight releases that I'm the first to NEWS on.  This
	is getting kinda scary!  I'm beginning to wonder who else actually does
	anything around here!  (Just kidding, of course.)  LOTS of new features
	and a crapton of bugfixes this release.  There should pretty much be
	something for everybody.  A great example of this is the ton of Yahoo
	changes that have happened thanks to our SoC student from 2008, Sulabh
	Mahajan.  Among his massive improvements are the ability to add MSN
	buddies by adding them as "msn/user@domain.tld" and peer-to-peer file
	transfers.  Of course, history shows we can't please everyine, so I'm
	sure I'll see a complaint or five thousand in trac.  Enjoy, though!

	Marcus: This is my first news! It's been quite a few microreleases this
	time, but now we're finally at 2.6.0. I suppose the most anticipated
	new feature in this release is the voice and video support, thanks to
	Mike's heroic work. I've managed to slip in a few features too, like
	in-band bytestream file transfers as a fallback on XMPP and idle time
	reporting on XMPP. Enjoy!

	Paul: This is my first news, too!  This release has definitely been a
	long time coming; hopefully it won't disappoint since we've closed over
	200 tickets.  Among other things, Tobias Markmann's GSoC project from
	last year was merged, which means we now support BOSH (XMPP connections
	over HTTP), and Andrei Mozzhuhin contributed an XMPP Service Discovery
	Browser.  Also, thanks to Bernmeister for poking (at least) several
	hundred old tickets!

	Mike: Ditto. This is my first news as well. I have a feeling this is
	getting repetitive at this point, but voice and video support is
	finally here! Thanks to the rest of the Pidgin team, Farsight 2, and
	GStreamer developers for making this possible! (I finally finished my
	Summer of Code project :D)

	Elliott: Hey, this is my firs... Wait, no it isn't.  Now I feel left
	out.  So have you heard about this voice and video thing?
	Unfortunately, not quite ready for all protocols, but it's getting
	there.  MSN gained support for receiving voice clips at least, and
	finally we have Ink receiving capabilities too.  Thanks to the guys
	who wrote the original patch.  And finally, MSN no longer has over a
	100 tickets open!

2.5.9 (08/18/2009):
	John:  This release is just a crash fix release to address a security
	issue reported to us by CORE and a couple crashes Elliott found.

2.5.8 (06/27/2009):
	John:  This release is another somewhat rushed bugfix release to fix
	a number of bugs that have come up since we released Pidgin 2.5.7.
	Hopefully anything I broke there is fixed now, or at least made to be
	less broken.  Enjoy!

2.5.7 (06/20/2009):
	John:  This release is really just a rushed fix for the broken Yahoo
	protocol plugin.  I spent way more time on this release than I care
	to admit, so I hope that time is well spent and this fixes the issues
	people have been having.

2.5.6 (05/19/2009):
	Ka-Hing: Many much bugfixes. Hooray. (Paul told me to say that)
	Oh, no one has met Paul yet? He's awesome, he backported my fixes
	to the release branch so I didn't have to checkout a
	workspace... except I just did to NEWS to tell you all about
	that. Oh and I actually did do something for this release, none of
	which is user visible though. This basically applies to the rest
	of the release as well, nothing exciting, but you definitely want
	it.

	Daniel: This should fix a number of annoying issues that some users
	have encountered.  We also would like to thank Veracode
	(http://www.veracode.com) who performed a code analysis and found some
	bugs that were addressed in this release.

	Elliott: I feel like I'm repeating myself, but there are some more MSN
	fixes that should make things better behaved at login as well, and
	maybe you'll stop getting some of those annoying errors (though not all
	are fixed yet).  Some other bugfixes, plus the craziness that is the
	libxml "structured error handler" make up the rest of this release.

2.5.5 (03/01/2009):
	John: Well, yet another release with bug fixing and patches.  Hopefully
	one of the fixed bugs is one that irritated you.  Also, thank Dimmuxx
	for spending far too much time working on ICQ this release.

	Elliott: Lots and lots of MSN bugfixes again (I hope they're fixed, at
	least).  I think we finally have OCS/Yahoo!/federated buddies working
	now.  And there should be some workarounds for some server things that
	may or may not have been our fault (like buddies on Allow+Block) which
	should make general usage a bit smoother.

2.5.4 (01/12/2009):
	John: Well, we fixed a few bugs for you this time around, I applied
	a few patches, and we've dealt with what feels like a TON of tickets
	about two very common issues.  Feels like time for a release to me.

	Etan: My first NEWS in quite a while and I don't have much to say.  I
	haven't been too active lately and I'm hoping that won't be the case
	going forward.  I managed to get in a few perl fixes and some UI
	language tweaks this release.  My plan is to work on some of the
	issues pointed out by mpt (during his expert review of pidgin a little
	while back) in the near future.

2.5.3 (12/18/2008):
	Mark: It's been about two months and woo-boy have we been fixing
	bugs.  Enjoy!

	Kevin: I didn't do much of anything this release, but Mark and
	John must be commended for their tireless efforts to fix bugs
	and approve patches, especially in areas of Pidgin that have
	not usually received much attention.  Lots of changes have
	been made, so definitely check the ChangeLog to see what's new.

	John: It feels like it's been an age or two since we last released,
	and I think it's well worth the wait.  Mark has sunk more time into
	MSN and MySpace IM this release than any sane person should be
	allowed to, and I've sunk more time into patches than I care to
	admit.  By my count, our ChangeLog has 58 bullet points(!) and we've
	closed 85 tickets specifically for this release.  Enjoy!

	Ka-Hing: Bring your XMPP server to 2008 some time in 2009 would be
	nice, DreamHost!

	Elliott: Well, I can't blame the server for this release taking so long
	but that's just how it worked out.  A few interesting MSN changes this
	time.  Hopefully, federated & Yahoo! buddies will work for you, but I'm
	not yet certain it's ready.  Mark made so many fixes, I'm not even sure
	I recognize everything anymore, but hopefully that'll make things less
	crashy for you.

2.5.2 (10/19/2008):
	Ethan: After a bit of a struggle with our services, which put
	this release off for an unfortunate length of time, we're
	ready for another bugfix release for your bug-free(er?)
	messaging pleasure.

	Sadrul: Despite our best efforts, this release got delayed by a
	couple of weeks.  But here it is! It is mostly a bug fix release, with
	a couple of important fixes, e.g. fix for the Yahoo! disconnect
	problem.  Also, welcome our newest Crazy Patch Writer, Marcus Lundblad,
	who, among various other fixes, has implemented custom smileys for the
	XMPP protocol, included in this release.  Enjoy!

	Stu: I guess this is the time of year for server migrations, and
	I've just about had enough of them.  Fortunately Pidgin is still fun,
	and this release should be superb.

	John: Although our services were down for quite some time, we didn't
	lose any data, except perhaps some mail that would have failed to make
	it to us.  Overall, the only major effect it had was to delay this
	release far longer than we expected.  Hopefully the bugfixes make you
	happy!

	Elliott: This release took a while, but that was due to an unfortunate
	server snafu.  I didn't have much to do with it, but hopefully the new
	servers will help us out a bit.  Anyway, mostly bug-fixes this time.
	Nothing spectacular, unless you happen to suffer from one of those bugs.
	Oh, and don't forget, the "Has you" tooltip is back!

2.5.1 (08/30/2008):
	Kevin: This release is mainly a bug-fix release.  It solves a few
	known crashes and updates some of our artwork.  Google's Summer of
	code recently finished up.  Some of our students are still working
	on their branches and none have been merged into released code yet.
	Look for some of those results to show up in Pidgin releases over the
	coming months.

	Elliott: I'm just commenting so Kevin wouldn't be the only one in NEWS
	and no-one else seems to want to.  Anyway, there's a couple MSN login
	fixes, so try it out.  The contact list problems might still be around,
	but you can probably find a workaround in trac.  And there's a tooltip
	fix for our AIM friends, not that I had anything to do with it (except
	closing many many duplicate tickets).

2.5.0 (08/17/2008):
	Daniel: Lots of good stuff in this release.  Lots of people have worked
	very hard on the updated MSN protocol, and it's finally time to bring
	it to the world!  There are myriad bugfixes, including some important
	ones so you should be sure to update.

	Hylke: Finally MSNP15 support.  To celebrate this I refreshed a lot of
	the smilies used in the protocol and added the long awaited indispensable
	bunny icon.  I think this is one of those releases that will make a lot
	of users happy, especially MSN users.

	Elliott: Oh look, my first NEWS!  Well anyway, with that new MSNP15
	support, this release is set up to be a huge success and a total flop
	all at the same time.  Here's hoping it's the "huge success" one for you.
	Those icon changes that Hylke made, while minor, really make things look
	a little cleaner, I think.  Oh yea, did I mention that MSNP15 stuff?

	Mark: Speaking of MSNP15, we'd like to welcome Elliott Sales de Andrade
	as a full fledged developer!  He took the last few strides mushing the
	new MSN code into shape.  Then he decided that wasn't enough and started
	doing other great stuff.

	Ka-Hing: "Reject"ing a certificate after your account is signed off is
	not recommended.  Deleting the file after you start sending it is also
	discouraged.

2.4.3 (07/01/2008):
	Richard: This release includes important bug fixes.  I'm just cutting
	the release.  Thank you to the real heroes who did the fixing!

2.4.2 (5/17/2008):
	Sadrul: We added some usability changes in this release, including the
	typing notification, buddyicon and input area size in the conversation
	windows, escape to close conversation windows etc.  These changes should
	make pidgin more usable and more fun for Everyone! *wink*

	Stu: I fixed some memory leaks, but nothing like as many as Daniel did.
	MSN buddy list synchronization should be significantly less painful now,
	and opening MSN inboxes might work better too.  SILC passphrase changes
	and support for passphrase-less keys has been improved also.

2.4.1 (3/31/2008):
	Stu: We fixed some bugs, this release should be 110% better than 2.4.0

	John: Well, I didn't really do much this release except muck about with
	the configure script.  Blame me if it worked in 2.4.0 but doesn't now.

	Will: We seem to be falling into a nice pattern of releasing on the last
	day of a month.  Hypothetical AIX users might be pleased to learn that
	Pidgin might actually run for them now!

2.4.0 (2/29/2008):
	John: While this release took what seems like forever to get out the
	door, I think it's well worth the wait, especially for Yahoo! users.
	This release serves up some fixes for long standing bugs and adds
	file transfer for transfers with newer Yahoo! clients (finally!).  As
	is standard with code I committed, where it works great thank the
	patch writer, and where it's broken, feel free to yell at me.  Enjoy!

	Sadrul: Finch is more colourful and blinky in this release!  There's
	now a log viewer, which is very useful, and also the ability to
	block/unblock buddies.  It's now also possible to find chat rooms on
	many services, e.g. XMPP, IRC, Yahoo! etc.  Happy Leap Day!

	Ka-Hing: I think all I've done for this release is committing some
	patches written by other people.

	Stu: Finally, 2.4.0 lands.  I didn't do all that much except complain
	about things I didn't like or just revert Sean's changes.  I'm quite
	pleased with how well it's turned out in the end.
	Happy Birthday Fred, you must be nearly 10 now ;-)

2.3.1 (12/7/2007):
	Stu: I'm sorry for the MSN problems and the plugin crashes in 2.3.0.
	Hopefully this will redeem us.  This fixes a number of bugs.  I'm a
	bit late but I'd like to welcome John to the team.  Enjoy!

	Luke: I've done absolutely nothing in the last 2 weeks, except watch
	others commit bug and, more, leak fixes.  People should be noticing
	remarkably fewer memory leaks now than 2 or more releases ago.

	Kevin: I'm not quite sure what happened to our MySpaceIM Summer of
	Code student, but I fixed a few MySpace bugs with idle and status.
	I will try to fix some of the other more significant bugs, after I
	figure out the protocol, especially including grouping issues.

2.3.0 (11/20/2007):
	Luke: While this does not have the new MSN code, rest assured that
	we are working on it and that it is nearing release.  This contains
	a significant number of fixes, including some that were marked as
	fixed for earlier releases.  Happy Thanksgiving!

	John: This is my first NEWS entry!  So, this time around we have an
	updated man page (the old one hadn't been really updated since
	before the GTK+ 2.0 migration!), lots of bug fixes, and some new
	features for you all.  Enjoy!

2.2.2 (10/23/2007):
	Luke: Because the main branch of pidgin development is still not
	ready for public consumption, I have taken some time to try to
	pull the many bug fixes that have happened since then into a
	separate branch.  This release is the result of that effort.

2.2.1 (9/28/2007):
	Richard: We have some new code in the pipeline, but it's not quite
	ready for a general release.  Instead, this is basically a bug fix
	release.

	Luke: Unfortunately the necessity of this bug fix release means
	some of the tickets that have been closed as part of the 2.2.1
	milestone are not actually fixed yet.  We have grabbed as many
	of the changes as we could while avoiding those that are as
	yet unstable though, and this should still be a marked
	improvement over 2.2.0.  We have spent a lot of time since the
	last release looking at the tickets that have been submitted
	and many of them have been closed.

	Stu: I haven't NEWS'd in a while.  I haven't actually done much for
	too long also, maybe I'll find some time soon.  This release is
	basically what 2.2.0 should have been - it actually compiles this
	time.

2.2.0 (9/13/2007):
	Sean: 2.2.0 contains the results of several major Google Summer
	of Code branches bringing some new, extraordinary features.  We
	have a new protocol, MySpaceIM, a bunch of new features for an
	existing protocol, XMPP, and nifty new certificate management
	to make sure your IM server is who it says it is.

	Ka-Hing: A number of you noticed crashes when dragging windows
	around when certain options are enabled.  Well, that was my fault,
	and Sadrul fixed it.  So Props to him and poos to me.  I haven't
	done much for this release, but the next one should contain
	something that I helped work on.  Hint: students are cheap slave
	coders!

	Kevin: I haven't really been coding much in Pidgin, and this
	release is no exception, but I will be working on getting our
	wonderful web site to be a little more functional by next
	release.  I promise!

2.1.1 (8/20/2007):
	Sean: Continuing our schedule of frequent releases, Pidgin 2.1.1
	is out.  In it, we've addressed a lot of UI issues from our
	experimental new changes introduced in 2.1.0, and gave a lot of 
	attention to Yahoo! and Bonjour.  Thanks to everyone who 
	contributed.

	Luke: We have reworked some parts of the conversation windows in
	response to user comments.  We did not quite reach 100 tickets
	closed this release, so a fair few will role over again.  Still,
	we are slowly but surely working our way through the reported bugs.
	Many thanks to everyone who has helped with tracking down the
	various issues, testing fixes, and getting patches in.

	Tim: Sean finally got me to fix some of the buddy list bugs with
	Yahoo! when in version 15 mode.  So now we have some Yahoo! to
	MSN support, which is kind of nice.  Looks like some others have
	been contributing to Yahoo! while I've been AWOL, so many thanks
	to them.

2.1.0 (7/28/2007):
	Sean: This release took a bit longer than 3 weeks, but boy is it 
	worth it!  We're beginning to experiment with new UI concepts and
	this release features a largely re-designed conversation window.
	We've closed 150 tickets for this release; much thanks go to all
	the developers, translators, and testers who made this possible.

	Ka-Hing: Sean said no one else NEWS'ed, so I figure I should.

2.0.2 (6/14/2007):
	Sean: Another big maintenance release.  Again, about 100 tickets were
	resolved in this release, and they keep coming in.  Lots of bug fixes,
	some minor icon adjustements, hopefully we addressed some ICQ
	internationalization issues, and support for Bonjour on Windows!
	Our next release will be 2.1.0, and will come with some great new
	features.

	Stu: I think we're gradually getting the hang of this 3 week thing
	again.  This release includes yet more bug fixes.  I'd also like to
	specifically thank Pekka Riikonen for the patch to enable using SILC
	Toolkit 1.1 with Pidgin/libpurple that is included in this release.

2.0.1 (5/24/2007):
	Sean: 2.0.1!  Three weeks later, as scheduled!  It is so nice to have
	regular, frequent, releases again!  This is a bugfix release; We have
	fixed over 100 issues reported to us at http://developer.pidgin.im.
	Thanks to everyone for their great work, and look for the next release
	in another three weeks!

	Stu: Lots'o'fixes in this.  I don't know how you users find so many
	things for us to fix.  24 hours in a day (sadly).  24 is divisible by the
	sum of its digits and by their product.  It is the smallest composite
	number, the product of whose divisors is a cube.

	Luke: I requested that we have a bug fix release, and so we have!
	Many, though unfortunately not all, of the reports that have been
	submitted to us since 2.0.0 have been fixed now, and so you should
	all have a much more stable experience with this release.  I also
	want to thank the many users who have resubmitted their reports
	as we close out the old Source Forge bug tracker.  If all goes well,
	your report will get the attention it deserves as we continue to
	work on Pidgin, Finch, and libpurple.

	Nathan: A ton of fixes have gone into this release.  The feedback
	we've gotten on 2.0.0 has been incredible.  Hopefully we've resolved
	most of the critical issues with 2.0.1.  If we haven't, I'm sure
	our wonderful users will let us hear about it.  I seem to be
	forgetting something...oh, right, I haven't promised any cool new
	features in the next release!  So, I promise at least one cool new
	feature in the next release...you just might have to adjust your
	definition of 'cool' to get it.

	Etan: Perl plugins now have access to almost all of the savedstatus
	API functions.  I also removed a couple of the preferences from the
	Pidgin GTK+ Theme Control plugin which should help many of the people
	for whom the configuration dialog size was a problem.  The removed
	preferences no longer had the effects they were added to have anyway.

2.0.0 (5/3/2007):
	Sean: 2.0.0! It's real exciting to finally release Pidgin 2.0.0! I'm
	really proud of all the work we've all done.  I'm pumped.  And, while
	I could go on about all the amazing thing that have been added since
	1.5.0, what I'm really excited about is getting back to a regular,
	rapid, release cycle of active, open development, unhindered by legal
	quandries.  Huge thanks to everyone involved.

	Luke: We have finally managed to get 2.0.0 out the door, after nearly
	but not quite 2 years of effort and fustration.  No one regrets more
	than I that we were unable to make any of betas 3-6 the actual release.
	But at long last, it is out, and life can return to a more normal
	state.  There were many tough calls to be made in the last 2 years.
	Not everyone has agreed with the resulting decisions, that is un-
	fortunate, but unavoidable.  Suffice it to say that despite what
	some users appear to think, a ton of thought, argument, discussion,
	and experimentation has gone into this release.  This release
	builds on many years of experience, both as developers writing the
	code, users using it, and in supporting other users.  I hope that
	those who download and install this will give it a fair shot, and
	attempt to avoid knee-jerk reactions.

	Evan: One small step for bird, one giant leap for birdkind... except
	this is hardly one small step.  A lot more has changed from Gaim 1.5.0
	than just the name. Pidgin has a *very* attractive new look, a whole
	new member of the family (Finch, formerly gaim-console) has been born,
	and libpurple has come into its own as a solid, full-featured library
	powering the greatest IM clients around.  Bugs were fixed and
	features were added by the hundreds (thousands?) since the last
	major release, all while improving performance and resisting feature
	creep.  As Luke said, a ton of thought and effort has gone into
	Pidgin 2.0.0; I'm proud to have played a part.

	Stu: We did it! finally, we have 2.0.0.  It's been a long time coming,
	but there's a great deal of goodness here.  When I say a long time, I'm
	not kidding - it's been 972 days since we branched off "oldstatus"
	(aka 1.x).  The early Greeks were uncertain as to whether 2 was a
	number at all (or if we'd ever make this release) - it has a beginning
	and an end but no middle (much like our unfortunately quiet development
	period).  2 is the first prime number and the only even prime. 2 is also
	the first deficient number (oh well).  There are only 10 types of people
	in the world - those who like our new names and those who do not.
	Enjoy!

	Richard: I'm very glad that we've finally gotten 2.0.0 released and
	I look forward to returning to a more normal development schedule.
	Again, a big thanks to everyone who helped in any way to get things
	where they are today.  Congratulations everyone!

	Sadrul: My first NEWS, and on what an occasion! Pidgin 2.0.0 is finally
	released!!  And it's *really* very good!!!  Give your soul a break ...
	Use Pidgin!

	Daniel: There has been a fair amount of weeping and gnashing of teeth
	due to the delays in getting this beast out.  I'm really happy that it
	is done.  I'm also very happy with what we're releasing - I think it is
	far more stable, packed with useful features and, dare I say, prettier
	than any previous release.

2.0.0beta7 (4/29/2007):
	Sean: Beta 7. The final beta. A few major changes from beta6. For
	starters, we have some new names. That's pretty cool. We have a new
	logo, to go along with it. And a lot of great icons! As Nathan mentions
	below, we're totally back in the open now, having a signed agreement
	from AOL that puts us in the clear. We all really regret having to go
	completely dark for so long. Anyway, unlike betas1-6, which were of
	normal release quality, this one is actually beta quality. There are
	a few significant known issues, and a lot of changes that need a lot
	of real-world testing. So, if you'd like to help us out, give it a
	whirl, and let us know if you run into any major issues.

	Nathan:  So, the secret is out now.  We renamed to Pidgin.  I'd just
	like to apologize to everyone we've had to keep in the dark for the
	last however-many months.  I know it looked like development slowed
	to a crawl, but in reality we've been working pretty hard to get 
	2.0.0 out the door, without getting into any legal trouble.  I
	realize that if we were some big corporation, we'd be getting flamed
	about this secrecy for months.  Please try to remember that we're
	just a bunch of geeks who were scared of legal stuff (well, at least
	I was.  Scared, that is).  The bottom line is that we're out in the
	open again, and fully plan to stay that way.  We're also opening up
	the mail archives from the secretive past few months.  You can scan
	through them if you want, or I can summarize.  "Are the lawyers done
	yet?  No.  Now?  No.  How about now?  No."  All lawyer jokes aside,
	I'm grateful to our legal team for crossing all the 't's and dotting
	all the lowercase 'j's to get us the deal we got.  Anyways, thanks
	for your patience, and on to 2.0.1!

	Gary: Well my silence, and our silence has ended.  Finally the name
	change is over and done with and we can go back to a normal dev
	cycle.  Now if I can just get myself back onto a normal dev cycle,
	but that's another story all together.

	Ethan: Not to be too "me-too", but I have to say that I'm really
	excited about the project's new name and identity, and glad to be
	out of the legal mess.  We're pushing beta 7 with all of the
	branding and organizational changes that have been going on for
	the last few months, so there are likely to be some snags --
	please help us out by trying beta 7, searching for any bugs you
	find in the bug tracker at http://developer.pidgin.im/, and
	documenting them if they are unknown or you can provide new
	information.  Help us make 2.0.0 final a release to be remembered
	(in a good way)!  I'd like to give huge thanks to all of the
	developers, our steadfast supporters, the crazy patch writers, and
	everyone else who has made this transition to Pidgin possible, and
	the improvements that go along with it.  I'd like to extend a
	special thanks to Sean, for leading us through the legal issues
	and taking care of all of the paperwork and overhead that no one
	wants to deal with.

2.0.0beta6 (1/17/2007):
	Sean: Barring any seriously major new issues, we expect this to be
	the final beta release before 2.0.0. This has a bunch of cool UI
	changes, some Google Talk features, a bunch new plugins, and other
	goodness.

	Nathan: Beta6 rocks.  That is all.

	Gary: Long time no news.  My silence will end soon ;)

	Evan: My first news! I knocked out a nice collection of crashes,
	thanks in part to my ever-patient Adium beta testers. Gaim 2.0.0
	is going to be delicious. :)

2.0.0beta5 (11/9/2006):
	Sean: Another release in our endless stream in betas. This one's
	pretty awesome; and it fixes major bugs introduced in previous
	ones.

2.0.0beta4 (10/17/2006)
	Sean: Still beta. Maybe the next one should be a gamma.. :)

	Daniel: I'm super chuffed to announce that this will work with newer
	(i.e. >= 2.8.0) versions of GTK+ on Windows.

	Luke: Several significant changes in this one, including no longer
	using libao for sound!  There are no doubt bugs here, but hopefully
	nothing major.

	Nathan: I don't have much to say, but yay for another beta!

	Etan: I did a bunch of perl work for this beta again, there is now
	some support for perl scripts to call functions in the gtk ui, it
	still needs work.

2.0.0beta3 (03/25/2006):
	Mark: Yeah, I know, another beta.  Don't worry, we'll get this
	puppy out the door eventually.

2.0.0beta2 (01/24/2006):
	Mark: So this is the new year, and I don't feel any different, but
	Gaim is getting better.  We hope this will be our last beta before
	we release the final version of 2.0.0.  As before, please shower us
	in feedback!

	Richard: I'm proud to say a lot of bugs have been squashed in this
	version.  If you filed a bug against beta1, please test to see if
	it's fixed now and update your bug report accordingly (by either
	closing it or setting the version to 2.0.0beta2).  I'm also looking
	for someone who uses Gaim on MacOS X to test a patch for me before
	I can commit it.  See http://gaim.sf.net/contactinfo.php for my
	contact information.

	Etan: So I did a bunch of work on the perl plugin since beta1, so
	anyone who uses perl plugins would do well to expect some things to
	need updating (I'm not certain everything works yet, so please send me
	any reports of things that don't). Most of the work was correcting
	some namespace issues, but I also improved the support for perl
	plugins having plugin_pref frames, and plugin actions. Multiple perl
	plugins can now have plugin_pref frames at the same time, and every
	perl plugin can have multiple plugin actions now. Like Mark said
	above, let us know how this beta works out.

2.0.0beta1 (12/17/2005):
	Sean: I think Nathan sums everything up really well below. There's still
	a bunch we want to add (and remove) before the official release, but we
	really want to start getting feedback about what's good and what's not.
	So, please, be vocal about this beta!

	Nathan: 15 months since we branched oldstatus, and started working on
	the behemoth that is 2.0.0.  In that time, we've added a couple new
	protocols, we had a few crazy patch writers become developers, and
	had a few more people step up to be crazy patch writers.  Sean wrote
	a book, and we arbitrarily decided to make a version 1.0.0, and a
	new versioning scheme.  We got new artwork, and added almost 200 lines
	to the ChangeLog.  We've watched 2 major GTK+ releases, and added all
	kinds of features using them.  OK, I've wasted enough bits here.  This
	beta rocks, but it is a beta.  Treat it as such, and enjoy!

	Gary: Finally we have a beta.  There are a lot of new goodies, including
	quite a few summer of code projects that couldn't get added into the
	oldstatus branch because API changes.  We also have a new mono plugin
	loader for even more plugin fun.

	Richard: Thanks to all who wrote patches (big or small) for this beta.

	Tim: Well here it is, the first beta. There's a lot of cool things in
	here, but not all of them are finished or debugged. But then that's
	why it's called a beta. Conversations are now contact-aware, and
	there's a new status selector. There's smooth scrolling on incoming
	messages as well. Our Crazy Patch Writers have been doing a good
	job too, it seems like we're never lacking some patches in the
	tracker to review.

	Etan: I know I'm not going to be able to think of all the things I should
	talk about here so I'll just go with the stuff I remember. Adding buddies
	on ejabberd jabber servers should work more correctly now (it's possible
	adding buddies on other servers is a bit broken currently I'm still
	looking into it). There are still other jabber issues I'm looking into
	with handling of buddies.
	In other topics, I finally brought my Accounts menu into gaim, though the
	current example of it isn't exactly what I had in mind, anyone with any
	suggestions/comments/etc about it please speak up.
	Other than the stuff I'm sure I'm forgetting to mention this beta should
	be awesome as gaim 2.0.0 is going to be awesome. Have fun with it.

	Luke: pretty much everything important has been said, so this is going to
	be rather repetative.  This is a beta folks, so it will have bugs.  It
	will crash unexpectedly.  Perhaps even frequently.  Use it at your peril.
	But do use it (though you might want to back up ~/.gaim first), and let us
	know what needs to be fixed.

	Mark: Yay.

	Stu: Wow!

	Siege: Sametime accounts created with gaim-meanwhile should merge over
	for use in the beta just fine. Some of the familiar settings regarding
	the buddy list are gone, so I recommend backing up your Sametime blist
	before getting down and crazy. Have fun, and happy early Decemberween!

	Daniel: Enjoy! In the hopes that this prevents someone pain... do not use
	Glib/GTK+ 2.8.x with Wingaim - it will not work.  We're looking into the
	problem and hope to have it resolved before the final release.
	"Happy Holidays!"

1.5.0 (8/11/2005):
	Mark: No super crazy major changes here.  Just the usual bug
	fixes and some pretty important security updates.

	Stu: Buy Sean's book. He obviously needs the money. Other than that
	we fixed some bugs with this release (I don't think we did much else).
	SoC students are doing lots of cool stuff which we'll hopefully be
	able to bring you in a future release.

	Nathan: I've continued my streak of doing nothing useful lately.
	However, I've now got a brand-spanking-new DSL line, so I might
	actually get to contribute soon.  One way or another I'd like
	to get HEAD into a more useable state in the next month or two.
	Also, like Stu said, buy Sean's book.  I've been reading and
	fixing it for the last umpteen months, so you had better enjoy
	it.

1.4.0 (7/7/2005):
	Mark: The last month or four we've promoted a bunch of the Gaim
	Crazy Patch Writers to developers, so there is now an even larger
	team of brilliant and amazingly sexy committers working around
	the globe for your instant messaging pleasure.  Also, we have
	what I believe to be our first contribution from a Summer of Code
	student in this release: Jonathan Clark enabled the sending of
	files to certain ICQ users.  Support is still a bit rough, but
	he'll be working on it throughout the summer.

	Luke: Exciting times this summer as our Summer of Code interns
	start their projects.  This is mostly a bug fix release, with the
	ICQ file transfer that Mark mentioned and some buddy icon work
	being the only real new code.  Hence the extra week delay.  A
	big thanks to our translators who keep churning out updates even
	when we give them short notice as well.  Enjoy!

1.3.1 (6/9/2005):
	Sean: It's been a while since I've done one of these. Welcome to
	Gaim 1.3.1, "New Hyde Park." This is, again, another bugfix release
	but it comes with two keen announcements. First, I'd like to welcome
	Christopher O'Brien to the Gaim team. He has integrated his work on
	the Meanwhile project into Gaim, ensuring that Gaim 2.0.0 will include
	Sametime support. Also, we're participating in Google's Summer of
	Code, which you all should check out at 
	http://gaim.sourceforge.net/summerofcode/

1.3.0 (5/10/2005):
	Luke: This release fixes SILC for multiple accounts.  HOWEVER, you
	may lose your buddy list (for SILC only) upgrading.  This is
	rather unavoidable as the previous code did not keep track of
	which account each buddy belonged to.

	Stu: I'm glad we're finally getting this out, if fixes a number of bugs
	ranging from minor to not so minor. I'd also like to welcome Gary to
	the team - he's done a great job with Guifications, I'm sure he'll do
	good stuff here too.

	Gary: Well I got pretty much nothing done for this release.  Although I
	do have quite a few things in the works that will come to fruition when
	I find some more free time.

1.2.1 (4/3/2005):
	Luke:  Several important fixes this time around.  Big thanks to 
	Robert McQueen, Stu, Nathan, Ethan, and everyone else who has helped 
	with this effort.  Maybe next time we can get a decent chance to fix the 
	problems *before* they go public to have a normal release process.

	Nathan: Jabber got some updates this release (finally).  I've got
	more planned, but simply haven't had the time to anything about it.

1.2.0 (3/17/2005):
	Luke: Happy St. Patrick's Day all.  Sean scheduled a release for
	today, we'll see if we can pull it off. :-)  This release
	features somewhat more than just bug fixes, some improvements
	have been made to the conversation API which may affect plugin
	developers.  Yahoo users should also thank Tim and Bleeter for
	their efforts.
	
	Etan: I'm going to NEWS since I actually did something this time.
	Jabber will allow you to unsubscribe to someone's presence
	without logging out and in again, this does break seeing yourself
	on your buddy list, but hopefully we'll fix that again for the
	next release. 
	
	Stu: Happy St. Guinness^wPatrick's day.
	
1.1.4 (2/24/2005):
	Sean: Another bug fix release. A big thanks to Rob McQueen, Ari
	Pollak, Don Seiler, and Warren Togami: some packagers who helped
	debug a nasty glib 2.6 problem. Also thanks to our own Stu who
	found and destroyed an MSN crash and an HTML parsing error

	Luke: Early release to handle the MSN and HTML crashes, as well
	as the glib crash.  Maybe that makes up for having had a 4 week
	period before the last release.  This one should be the nice
	stable release we meant 1.1.3 to be. Enjoy!

	Stu: I cleaned up the whitespace in this NEWS, it was bugging me.

1.1.3 (2/17/2005):
	Luke: Yet another bug fix release, many thanks to everyone who has
	helped to make gaim more stable!

	Stu: I fixed too many Yahoo HTTP proxy bugs, I should just go and
	write some core HTTP support that works better. A good all round
	bug fix release otherwise.

1.1.2 (1/20/2005):
	Luke: Another Bug fix release. This one featuring a fix to the HTTP
	Method for MSN users and other MSN fixes. A big thanks to Stu and
	Felipe Contreras for those. Stu also spent a long time in valgrind
	and so this brings you a Gaim release with fewer memory leaks. This
	release is on time primarily because I want to see the MSN fixes
	make it into Debian and Fedora before freezes. Expect further bug
	fix only releases to come at longer intervals, at Mark's request.

	Daniel: This is my first NEWS! (YaY) I didn't really do too much for
	this release.  There are a few bugfixes, mostly wingaim stuff. Oh, and
	I like the new XP System Tray icons.

	Sean: I'm down here today. I haven't really been paying too much
	attention to these boring bugfix releases, but I'd like to thank
	David and welcome him to the team. I'd also like to thank Steven
	and Nathan from Silverorange who redid the webpage.

	Tim: Another bug fix release. I didn't really fix any bugs, so
	I didn't exactly do much for this one. The autopackage will now
	work with mozilla-nss, if anyone has that, and not gnutls11. (It
	works with either gnutls11 or mozilla-nss, but not gnutls10)
	I started working on Gaim-vv again though, and I merged someone's
	custom msn smiley patch into the 2.0.0 tree, so expect good things
	whenever that's released (no, don't try it now, you won't like it).
	Oh and welcome to the team Daniel. Of course, he was already on my
	Gaim-vv team.

	Stu: Welcome Daniel! you've done some good stuff already. Felipe did some
	good work on MSN yet again, so you can all use the HTTP method now. I
	didn't do all that much, other than let valgrind tell me what to fix, and
	a couple of easy bug fixes from the bug tracker. Hopefully Ethan will get
	well soon, so he can get back to merging patches and fixing things.

	Nathan: I think I made some Jabber fixes, at least one of which is
	ChangeLog'd.  I will continue to make empty promises about new features,
	especially for 2.0.0.  Until then, welcome Daniel!

1.1.1 (12/28/2004):
	Luke: This bug fix release features msn improvements, drag and drop
	improvements, and some translation stuff. Thanks for everone who has
	helped with it, and hopefully we can get 2.0.0 out soon. On a side
	note, i'm still looking for someone to look at the perl plugin loader.

1.1.0 (12/02/2004):
	Luke: Another in our series of bug fix releases, with a slight twist.
	Everyone thank Ethan for implementing a fall back encoding for IRC,
	it has been much requested and should make a number of users very
	happy. See the ChangeLog for details on other fixes.

	Stu: Much thanks to Miah Gregory and Felipe Contreras, a bunch of
	memory leaks have been fixed. Felipe also fixed a good number of
	other MSN bugs. I didn't do much except apply these guys fixes. It's
	good to see fixes from Gary coming in again too ;-). I like the
	docklet adjustments Christian made. Btw, we have a new MSN protocol
	icon, and I think you'll love it.

	Tim: I made Gaim binary relocatable this release, so Gaim can find
	itself if it gets lost, and I'm going to try to make autopackages
	for this release, if the autopackage guys release their new version
	soon like they're talking. I also "fixed" a scrolling bug, by
	realizing it was all Gentoo's fault. The IRC encoding thing Ethan
	did is pretty nice, no more encoding error messages!

	Ethan: Rumor has it that I did some work this release, but it's just
	that, a rumor.  I think Luke started it.  I did lay the hammer  down
	on  bogus  word  wrapping in the NEWS, so you can thank me for that.
	Keep your powder dry.

1.0.3 (11/11/2004):
	Luke: Not much to see here, some bug fixes that you all will enjoy as
	the semester draws to a close and everyone still in school gets bogged
	down with projects, papers, and exams. Enjoy! Oh, and if you are interested
	in the perl or gadu-gadu functionality, please step up to help write
	patches, as both of these code blocks are currently unmaintained.

	Tim: I fixed a couple bugs this time. In other news, Kim wants to get
	a pet cockatiel or two.

	Nathan: I was gonna put a new feature in this release, but decided
	not to because I found a bug in it today, and I'm tired.  Also, I haven't
	consulted the powers-that-be about putting new features into oldstatus.

	Stu: I'm writing this at 11:11:11pm on 11/11. Eleven. It's 3 really. Or B.
	It's the 5th smallest prime number. Himalia is the 11th moon of Jupiter.
	Hendecagon. There are 1011 players on a football team. XI. 16 hours. Eleven
	is the smallest positive integer requiring three syllables in English. This
	entry is my 11th lie for today.

1.0.2 (10/19/2004):
	Stu: I'm new around here. I tried to reduce the number of bugs in the bug
	tracker, but it turns out that the only way to achieve that is to actually
	_fix_ the bugs. So I fixed a couple, and then sneaked some patches out of
	the patch tracker to fix some others. Sadly the bug tracker was not
	significantly affected, maybe if I learn C I'll be able to make more of an
	impact.

	Luke: Don't let Stu fool you, he has done a marvelous job on this release,
	and deserves a lot of credit for it. And a number of those bug fixes are
	critical ones that he discovered and fixed himself. So go update. Now.

	Nathan: On the other hand, Nathan has done nothing for this release.  Why
	do we keep him around again?

	Tim: So, I'm married now, and in Huntsville. I don't remember if I did
	anything for this release or not, probably not. Bleeter has been more
	active lately though, perhaps we'll see lots of cool things from him
	soon.

	Sean: I'm down here with the "didn't do anything" guys.

1.0.1 (10/07/2004):
	Congratulations to Tim & Kim on their wedding!

	Sean: So, if you're playing along at home, you're aware that
	incrementing the micro version number means that the API has
	not changed at all.  Although that itself is insignificant to
	most everyone but plugin developers, but users won't find too
	many significant changes.  Consult ChangeLog.  We're currently
	branched for some major changes, so expect a really great 2.0.0
	sometime relatively soon.

	Luke: Nothing much to see here, some bug fixes. Most of the work
	is going towards the 2.0.0 release. We aren't quite sure when
	that will be, and will keep the bug fix releases coming untill
	all is ready.

	Christian: I would call this a ground-breaking release, but it isn't.
	It seems like a good one, though. I dunno. I've been too busy at VMware,
	unfortunately, but have some work that's just waiting to be finished up
	for Gaim. Gaim 2.0.0 is going to rock. Gaim 3.0.0 will rock more.
	Do you see a pattern? Thanks go out to Henry Jen for fixing up parts of
	the gevolution plugin to support multiple addressbooks, and to all our
	moms, for believing in us. Or something.

	Nathan: I got a new computer.  It's fast.  And has twice the bits!

1.0.0 (09/17/2004):
	Nathan: Hah!  Bet you weren't expecting this!  OK, if you were
	paying any attention to the flame^H^H^H^H^Hthread on gaim-devel,
	you might have been expecting this.  But here it is, 1.0.0.  Our
	new versioning scheme has slightly more meaning than the older
	one (expecially for plugin authors), but our 1.0(.0) release is
	just as meaningless as we could have hoped.  Enjoy!

	Luke: We've changed our pattern for version numbers with this
	release, we are no longer simply counting versions. This release
	then marks, not something traditionally "1.0" but the current
	version of the api.  When backwards compatability with that breaks
	you'll see 2.0, more details in the faq.  As a side note, if you
	are reading this and are good with proxy code or with perl's XS C
	bindings, please get in touch with me, my contact info is on the
	website.  Gaim could use your help.

	Mark: I love a circus.

0.82 (08/25/2004):
	Rob: Woah, where did I come from? 

	Mark: Lately I've been doing a lot more code maintenance/patch
	accepting/bug fixing type of work.  And I think that's a really
	good thing.  I feel like Gaim is becoming more stable.  It
	seems like we're lacking fewer features.  It makes me warm.
	Quick Robin!  To the traverse wall!

	Nathan: Well, it looks like we stuck to the schedule again.  Had
	we taken our dear sweet time, I might have had a chance to do
	something cool for this release, but instead I stuck to the minor
	stuff.  <insert empty promises for the cool stuff i'll code for
	next time here>

	Tim: Lately I've been doing a lot more patch accepting, and a
	lot less actual coding. Unfortunately it has more to do with my
	laziness than Gaim's progress. Like Nathan, I'm going to blame
	our on time release schedule. But that didn't stop our Crazy
	Patch Writers, or cpw's as grim now calls them, from writing
	some good patches. So, instead of promising to code something
	cool for next release, I'm going to promise that the cpw's will
	code cool things for next release, and I might apply some of them.

	Luke: I've been doing what I always do, committing patches, some
	better than others, and bugging other people to code stuff. Oh
	and closing some bugs. Thanks to Dave West for joining the cpws
	in helping to handle triage. This is mostly a bug fix release,
	so PLEASE upgrade to it before submitting new bugs.

	Kevin: Herman's been away, so Daniel Atallah and myself were given
	the task of preparing 0.82's Windows packages. After some feverish
	plotting, we decided to update GTK and Daniel prepped an update to
	libpng to address recent security advisories. Besides plotting and
	a little bit of testing, this NEWS is all I really did. Oh, I also
	rerefixed the transparency plugin... again! Our beloved Hermanator
	should be back next time around, for 0.83.

0.81 (08/05/2004):
	Sean: Three weeks again!  Sticking to schedules is awesome!  Just
	like Gaim v0.81.  This is what we in the industry call a "bugfix
	release."  We closed over TWO HUNDRED bugs since 0.80.  That's
	awesome.  Thanks to everyone who helped report, triage, fix, and
	test.

	Christian: Yay for three weeks working so well. Boo for me not
	doing much of anything this release, aside from a small memory
	leak fix. I'm starting a new job and leaving my current one, so
	when the dust settles and my schedule is a bit better, the very
	cool status rewrite will be finished up. Especially now that I have
	some help! I'd like to second Sean's thanks to all the people who
	helped with this bug fix release. Gaim should be a bit more stable
	for a lot of you. For those experiencing MSN problems still, we'll
	get that nailed for you soon, promise.

	Mark: I was going to point out that we closed an insane amount of
	bugs for this release, but Sean already did that.  I feel like 
	we've had some really talented new contributors contributing 
	recently.  I won't say names... but watch your backs.  Or something.

	Nathan: I did next to nothing for this release.   I am however
	settled in to my new job, and in a couple days, I should be settled
	into my new domicile.  If the DSL gods are in a good mood, I'll
	have a connection there shortly, and can start being useful again.

0.80 (07/15/2004):
	Sean: Three weeks!  Hooray for timeliness!  I didn't do much here
	but drag-and-droppable file transfers.  Drag something into a
	conversation window, and it will be sent.  Kinda neat.

	Mark: We have a small ant problem here.  I can't help but think
	I somehow brought this upon myself.

	Tim: I don't really have any news, but at least I don't have an
	ant problem either. You might think I've been hard at work on
	Gaim-vv, but I haven't, I've just been lazy. I plan on doing
	some cool things "soon" though, both with Gaim and Gaim-vv.
	Bleeter sent me some nice dumps I need to implement yet.

	Luke: We have a nice timely release, with a Changelog that seems
	small, but remember, this is summer, and people have lives. SILC
	and Zephyr are making good progress from our Crazy Patch Writters,
	and everyone begging to send files to people not on their buddy
	list will be happy. good stuff. No, the msn buddy icon scalling
	problem isn't fixed yet, maybe next release

0.79 (06/24/2004):
	Sean: We've moved to a three-week release cycle which we'll
	hopefully be able to keep up more realistically than a two-week
	cycle.  Yahoo! went and broke last night, but it's fixed now thanks
	to a quick fix sent in by Cerulean Studios this morning. Reports say
	they'll continue to try to break us, though, so don't be surprised
	if your Yahoo cuts out again.

	Luke: I was really distracted this cycle, I want to thank my co-
	developers and our crazy patch writers for keeping things going.
	We have a fairly long changelog for you this release, including some
	nice bug fixes and some much-requested new features, the ChangeLog
	has all the details there of course. Enjoy!

	Christian: Great release! MSN buddy icons and file transfer. A big round
	of applause to Felipe! Too bad about the Yahoo thing, but.. eep! I have
	to go! Movie with the girls and Farmer's Market.

	Tim: This release brings us /commands in the core, which hopefully
	works better, and Yahoo! buddy icons. Thanks to all the people I
	bugged for packet captures, like Simguy, Bleeter, and odl. Yahoo!
	broke again, so I did a little last minute work on the web
	messenger stuff, but then Cerulean Studios was cool and fixed the
	problem already, so all that code's disabled. I also finally added
	the Yahoo! Japan support, for those of you with Yahoo! Japan
	accounts.

	Mark: I fixed that icon animation thing that caused Gaim to lock-up.
	I also stepped on something at the beach and I think there might be
	a little rock or something in my foot now.

	Nathan: I've been really busy, what with having a new job and all.
	I didn't think I had done anything, but apparently I fixed some
	Jabber stuff, and some IPv6 stuff.  I must have been sleepcoding
	or something, because I haven't had time for such things.  Ah well,
	enjoy this release.  We'll see what I can get to in the next 3 weeks.

0.78 (05/30/2004):
	Luke: A very long time, once again, since the last release. I think
	its mostly worth it. A few of you will still have trouble with msn
	but we've worked out a number of bugs even there.  Thanks to heroic
	efforts on the part of Mark, we closed 400 some odd reports this
	month.  We are also welcoming Tim to the project, a very active
	crazy patch writer who has brought massive improvements to WYSIWYG
	and direct im this release. Again, it still won't work for every
	one, but it will work for more people than it used to. Most
	noticably, this release brings a LARGE simplicfication of the
	preferences available. Please don't complain if your favorite
	preference is no longer there. Take some time to think about
	how and if it could be useful to a majority of people who use
	Gaim in ways nothing like you. You'll find that the answer will
	usually be that the preference isn't all that important.

	Tim: I continued with the other crazy patch writers in fixing those
	WYSIWYG bugs. Then they went and made me a developer. Which is cool.
	They told me I could commit WYSIWYG and Yahoo! changes. So I went
	and fixed IM Image and Direct Connect in AIM for some reason. I also
	added some new Yahoo! smileys at least. Also you change your link
	color in your ~/.gtkrc-2.0 file now. I might work on some of those
	new Yahoo! features for next release, like buddy icons. But don't
	count on it. Thanks to everyone who congratulated me. And thanks
	to all our Crazy Patch Writers, who now expect me to apply all their
	Crazy Patches.

	Christian: First of all, congrats to Tim! He's our latest Gaim
	developer, and we're all glad to have him on board. He's been a
	valuable contributor for awhile now. Thanks again to Felipe Contreras
	for all his MSN work this release. He has some exciting stuff that
	we'll be seeing in 0.79. And last, but not least, thanks to all our
	crazy and not-so-crazy patch writers. There's been a lot done this
	release.  I've been taking a small break, first due to school and now
	work, but I'll be coming back strong in the next couple of releases. In
	the meantime, enjoy.

	Gary: Congrats to Tim, no more competing for most ChangeLog entries.
	This means you _should_ be winning every release.  Anyways, I didn't
	finish nearly as much as I wanted to for this release but all of that
	and then some should appear in 0.79.

	Sean: I'll write my entry down here tonight.  Removing preferences
	was my big crusade this week, and the team did a great job at it,
	but I still have a nagging feeling that our preferences are still
	overwhelming.  Everyone's been doing a real great job; it's entirely
	my fault we keep failing to meet our three-week schedule.  Send your
	complaints this way.

	Nathan: I really didn't do much thanks to exams, and graduation, and all
	of that fun stuff.  For next release, I'll have all new excuses, like my
	new job, or maybe something I haven't even thought of yet.  Oh yeah, and
	a big warm welcome to Tim!

0.77 (04/22/2004):
	Sean: We're back to a somewhat regular release cycle now.  Hooray!
	WYSIWYG is much improved in this release, and you can now copy and
	paste rich text to and from Gaim and other applications (see: Mozilla,
	Evolution OpenOffice).  Also, Novell has released their first release
	of their GroupWise plugin, included in this release.  Good stuff all
	around.

	Luke: Only a week "late" this time around, much nicer than the delay
	before the last release.  Anyway, this release sees a HUGE number of
	improvements to the WYSIWYG support, much thanks to all involved. If
	you weren't impressed before, you should be now!  This release also
	sees the end of our TOC support, no one has been working on this in
	some time and its causing problems. DON'T USE IT!.  Also plugin
	authors will want to take note of the fact that the plugin api version
	changed. A nice solid release for you all :-)

	Ethan:  Once  again  I  thought  about doing some things and committed
	things that other people did.  This development model is  awesome.   I
	helped  Mark  refactor  some  stuff  and our collective code ownership
	helped us utilize a coherent system metaphor during our pair  program-
	ming  sessions.   It was extremely extreme.  Look for some hard crypto
	lovin' from yet another crazy contributor in the near future...

	Ka-Hing: I actually did something for this release... or rather, the
	previous release, but LSchiere2 didn't commit that until this release.
	So blame him. System logging is back, so you can log people's signon/
	off/away/idle-ness again. There may be bugs with it, I don't know, not
	like I use it. I will try to work on something that I will actually use
	for the next release.

	Etan: Looking for someone to pair program with.

	Christian: A round of applause to our crazy patch writers! Their
	contributions this release is impressive. WYSIWYG has come a long way
	since 0.76 thanks to them. Also, thanks to Felipe Contreras for his
	MSN contributions. We should see some good stuff going into there soon.
	I myself didn't do a huge amount, aside from breaking everybody's
	plugins, although I have some work going on in the background that will
	hopefully make it into release soon.

0.76 (04/01/2004):
	Sean: Yeah, it's been a long time since the last release, and despite
	what others may tell you, we were just really lazy.  This is pretty
	much just 0.75 again, but, like, someone changed the "Info" icon and
	I think, like, the Chinese translation may have been updated.  We did
	nothing interesting on it at all.  Others may tell you "we haven't just
	been lazy," or "you guys will find that we've managed to do some neat
	stuf in this one."  They lie.  All of them.

	Luke: Okay, normally I wait for Sean to go first, but he said to commit.
	Its been a few months since the last release, but we haven't just been
	lazy. A very long ChangeLog for you all. Most notably of course is the
	addition of WYSIWYG input for chats and conversations. Many thanks to
	DAYS of long work by Sean, Gary Kramlich, Kevin Stange, Tim Ringenbach,
	and Stu Tomlinson for their efforts writting, fixing, and testing
	this.  Without the dedicated support of our crazy patch writters, this
	release would have taken yet longer. Sean also has yahoo working again,
	with some assistance from our friends over at Trillian, you may all
	officially rejoice. We also have a large number of bug fixes, closing
	more than 200 bug reports this month alone.

	Christian: It's been a long time between the last release, but I think
	you guys will find that we've managed to do some neat stuff in this one.
	So many bug fixes and new features. It's enough to drive a wombat mad!
	The new WYSIWYG input is cool stuff. You'll either love it or hate it,
	I guess. I'm working on some stuff that some of you are going to love,
	but I'm not promising it for a few more versions. It's a secret!

	Mark: Our crazy patch writers rock.  Gary Kramlich, Tim Ringenbach,
	Kevin Stange, and Stu Tomlinson did an amazing job of tying up
	loose ends and helping get this release out the door.  Thanks guys!

	Rob: My birthday is in a few days.  I like cool stuff.  Buy me something
	grand!!

	Tim: Luke said write a NEWS, so I thought I would.  There's a room
	list dialog now. And Nathan and I doubled the number of protocols that
	can transfer files.  After that I got lazy/busy and let Gary, Kevin,
	and Stu fix all the bugs.

	Nathan: Rob happens to share a birthday with my sister.  So far she's
	been very vague about what she wants.  She's not an easy person to shop
	for.  As for things you probably care more about, this release has so
	much in it that I've forgotten about most of it.  The stupidest of the
	bugs from 0.75 are fixed.  Jabber has a first pass at file transfer
	support (no proxy support yet).  SOCKS 5 proxy support may have gotten
	a little better as a side-effect.  Twinkies and penguin points to all
	of the crazy patch writers, who did more than their fair share this
	release.

	Ethan:   My   birthday  was  yesterday, and not on the same day as Rob
	and Nathan's sister.  And I don't mean that Rob and  Nathan  have  the
	same  sister.   For this release, I thought about making IRC better, I
	thought about making Tcl better, and I committed patches from  several
	others  who  actually   did  these  things.   And  probably some other
	things, too.  Let's hear it for crazy patch writers, and for the  open
	source philosophy that lets them get so CRAZY.

0.75 (01/09/2004):
	Rob: Woah, what's this? Me? Making a NEWS post!? Say it ain't so!
	That's right, kiddos, I'm finally coming out of my reclusiveness.
	I had a pretty shitty few months, and also just needed a break from
	things.  But, I'm back, and that's good.  Right?  Yes.  And now,
	a little word from Eric Warmenhoven.. :P

	Eric: Ah, Rob and Eric.  Just like the good ol' days.  Now, if
	you'll excuse me, I have to go make some commits with Led Zeppelin
	lyrics as my commit logs.  heh.  What do you mean, I look a lot 
	like Sean Egan?  I'm... oh fine, you got me.  It's really just Sean
	in an Eric Warmenhoven costume.

	So, Yahoo! works again, and that's good.  And 0.76 is going to have
	something _very_ neat.

	Nathan: You're running out of excuses to not use Jabber.  Our chat
	support is now bar-some, quickly approaching bar-none!  Everything
	else in Jabber got neat improvements too.  I'll leave it up to you
	to figure out what they were.

	<boilerplate promises for cool features in $version++>

	Christian: I've been a bit absent this release, due to life stuff
	and working on some other projects. Some MSN goodies are going to be
	available in an upcoming version, and I have some neat Gaim-related
	stuff I'm working on that will hopefully see the light of day. I'd
	like to say good job to the other developers. Good release. (Of course,
	every time I say that, something breaks horribly right after we
	release it.)

	Luke: Okay, so Sean rocks and got Yahoo working again in 12 minutes.
	Unfortunately, he took out the chat support in doing so. So use
	conferences for now if you use yahoo. Users begging for file
	transfer support should thank Tim 'marv' Ringenbach for Yahoo ft,
	and everyone should be happy to note that 0.75 leaks far less than
	0.74. Also, a lot of other bug fixes happened that escape my notice
	right now.

	Ethan: I just want to say that now logging really doesn't eat
	memory 'till the cows come home.  We don't think.

	I would like to thank each and every one of these people, and
	I think you should, too:

	Paul A, Daniel Atallah, Patrick Aussems, Brian Bernas,
	Jonas Birm, Ethan Blanton (hi Mom), Joshua Blanton, Herman
	Bloggs, Jason Boerner, Graham Booker, Craig Boston, Chris
	Boyle, Jeremy Brooks, Sean Burke, Cerulean Studios LLC,
	Ka-Hing Cheung, Arturo Cisneros Jr., Vincas Ciziunas, Joe
	Clarke, Todd Cohen, Felipe Contreras, Jeramey Crawford, Mark
	Doliner, Nuno Donato, Jim Duchek, Tom Dyas, Andrew Echols,
	Sean Egan, Brian Enigma, Stefan Esser, Larry Ewing, Jesse
	Farmer, Gavan Fantom, Rob Flynn, Nathan Fredrickson, Free
	Software Foundation, Decklin Foster, Adam Fritzler, Michael
	Golden, Ryan C. Gordon, Christian Hammond, Andy Harrison, G.
	Sumner Hayes, Mike Heffner, Iain Holmes, Karsten Huneycutt,
	Akuke Kok, Tero Kuusela, Dennis Lambe Jr., Ho-seok Lee, Moses
	Lei, Ambrose C. Li, Nicolas Lichtmaier, Artem Litvinovich, Syd
	Logan, Matthew Luckie, Brian Macke, Paolo Maggi, Willian T.
	Mahan, John Matthews, Ryan McCabe, Robert McQueen, Robert
	Mibus, Benjamin Miller, Kevin Miller, Paul Miller, Arkadiusz
	Miskiewicz, Andrew Molloy, Matt Pandina, Ricardo Fernandez
	Pascual, Havoc Pennington, Ari Pollak, Robey Pointer, Nathan
	Poznick, Brent Priddy, Federicco Mena Quintero, David Raeman,
	Etan Reisner, Kristian Rietveld, Tim Ringenbach, Andrew
	Rodland, Neil Sanchala, Carsten Schaar, Luke Schierer, Torrey
	Searle, Jim Seymour, John Silvestri, David Smock, Mark
	Spencer, Lex Spoon, Kevin Stange, David Stoddard, Stu
	Tomlinson, Brian Tarricone, Peter Teichman, Arun A. Tharuvai,
	Philip Tellis, Bill Tompkins, Tom Tromey, Junichi Uekawa,
	Bjoern Voigt, Nathan Walp, Eric Warmenhoven, Jason Willis,
	Matt Wilson, Ximian, Jaroen Zwartepoorte.

	Thanks, all.

0.74 (11/25/2003):
	Sean: Christian and Nathan were wrong.

	Ethan: I don't know how solid or good this release will be, but
	hopefully it's better than 0.73!  Not that 0.73 didn't rock or
	anything, but for those users bit by its peculiar little bugs
	it wasn't as nice as this will be.

	Nathan: Jabber got some good tweaks, and logging doesn't eat
	memory until the cows come home.  Which is good, because they
	said they'll be out until late.

	Luke: Always nice when directories get created correctly ;-)

0.73 (11/21/2003):
	Nathan: This should be a really solid release.  I fixed most if not
	all of the idiotic Jabber bugs from 0.72, and re-enabled the SASL
	login stuff, now that it is finalized in the XMPP drafts.  Oh, and
	we now have a release notification plugin, so you can find out when
	the latest and greatest version of Gaim is out without breaking that
	reload button in your browser.  There's other fun new stuff, but I
	forget what it is.

	Christian: This is a good release, as Nathan said. For all those who
	hated all the disconnect dialogs, we now have a {dis,re}connect{ed,}
	dialog that replaces all of them and shows every account that became
	disconnected. Also, there were some MSN fixes thrown in, such as
	the problem with unblocking users. My personal favorite, since it's
	really been bugging me for awhile, is the bug with the border on the
	close buttons is fixed.  Oh yes, and let's not forget the new logging.
	It simply rocks.  This is a pretty stable release, so get it.  0.74 is
	going to have some niceties that people have been waiting for.

0.72 (10/30/2003):
	Sean: I think I'll go as the Gaim logo guy for Halloween.  That
	would be a cool costume.

	Luke: We've had a record month for number of bugs submitted (395 as
	of now) this month, but the total number of bugs open has grown by
	less than 20, so while it might be fustrating for those of you out
	there who think your bug report is being ignored, know that we are
	doing our best to look at them all :-). This release fixes a goodly
	number of bugs including the troubles with signing on icq (thanks
	to Mark). Enjoy!

	Christian: Last release brought forward a lot of bug reports, such
	as the ICQ bug, and also trouble with installing SSL. I can't count
	how many people were confused as to why their MSN plugin wasn't
	loading. Now, it'll load regardless, and when you try to connect,
	it'll give you an error dialog saying to install SSL (if you don't
	have it installed, of course). I didn't do a whole lot this release,
	but that'll change with the next. There are some fun things coming.

	Ethan: In complete defiance of history, I did something this
	release.  It had to do with IRC.  If I type here for long
	enough, I'm sure I'll remember what it was...  Oh yeah, all of
	you paranoid people can hide your local username by changing
	your IRC account settings.  I also want to note that we are
	aware that building Gaim is Harder than it Should Be on
	Solaris, and I am seeking solutions to some of the issues
	there.  Everyone remember to give some love to the developers
	who actually did something of note this release (i.e. not me)!

	Nathan: Jabber got a ton better this release, as I fixed most of the
	bugs introduced in the last release.  Registration works again, and
	the next person to break it is going to suffer.  I also fixed a
	handfull of other little things that I can't remember.  This should
	be a good release.

0.71 (10/09/2003):
	Rob: It's been a while since I've commited some news.  I've had a
	very hectic few weeks/months.  Thing are finally coming together
	again for me.  This release features much copying and pasting. Yeah.

	Sean: I can't wait for everything to be core/ui split!

	Christian: This is a good release, and I don't think people will have
	too many problems. There are a lot of little nice feature additions,
	and much progress has been made on the core/UI split. We should be done
	in a couple of releases, assuming we can get the remaining two or three
	parts core/UI-split. Oh, and plugin authors are going to hate me again,
	as a lot of code (specifically, the conversations code and utility
	functions) changed names. This is a Good Thing (TM), as always, but may
	require modifications to some plugins. Not all, fortunately, but some
	:) Many SSL problems were fixed, though we still have some to go.  If
	you don't have SSL, you now need it for MSN. MSN won't even load without
	it. Starting October 15th, the old protocol won't be supported
	anymore, so there's no reason to support the old one anymore.

	Herman: I bet some plugin authors have resorted to making voodoo dolls
	of Christian.  Nothing new for Win Gaim users other than a fix for
	missing aim buddy icons, and removal of gtk-wimp (until it matures).

	Mark: People are going to make a voodoo doll of me and shower it with
	kisses and chocolate women: When an AIM user is away, you can now view
	the person's away message in their tooltip.  This is very similar to
	what iChat does, only our tooltip will wrap lines rather than displaying
	off your screen :-)

	Nathan: Chocolate women are cool, but I'm a bigger fan of the real kind.
	I re-wrote the Jabber support from scratch, so now there's at least one
	person who knows what's going on with it.  I got lost in the old code,
	even in the parts I wrote.  It now supports the SASL login stuff from
	the XMPP protocol specs, and will automagically upgrade the conncetion
	to SSL if it's supported.  If anything doesn't work like it did before,
	it's probably better, and you should be thankful for it.

	Ethan: I'm sure I'll be showered with all kinds of wonderful things,
	but I doubt it's because I did anything.  The reason being that I
	really don't think I did anything.  I meant to do some gaim_
	prepension and documentation for IRC and Tcl, and handle IRC errors
	more responsibly, but I've been meaning to do that for months.
	Except the Tcl part, the Tcl plugin hasn't even existed for months.
	I figure if I write enough NEWS no one will notice I didn't do
	anything during the release cycle.  Oh, I did close some bugs.  I
	didn't fix them, mind you, I just closed them.  With abandon.
	Don't tell Luke.

	Luke: Mmmm, I probly did even less than Ethan, except I closed rather
	more bugs for other reasons. Lots of you submitting duplicate bugs.
	This should be a pretty good release. We still have a couple crashes
	in ssl stuff, but we fixed a number of the bugs in the tracker, and
	the code cleaning helps alot as well. Enjoy!

0.70 (9/28/2003):
	Sean: Yahoo! works (for now).  That's good NEWS if I've ever heard it.  
	Huge thanks to our dear friends over at Cerulean Studios, creators of
	Trillian, for helping us out.

	Nathan: This release also works out most of the kinks in the new
	contact support.  The Jabber goodies I promised will have to wait
	for now.

	Christian: I didn't really do anything except fix a couple of issues
	loading protocol plugins that had plugin dependencies and getting perl
	to install where we tell it to. I had hoped that 0.70 would include
	a finished libgaim, but Yahoo kind of wrecked that dream. We'll see it
	within the next few releases. Life has been busy in a good way :)

0.69 (9/24/2003):
	Sean: MSN and Yahoo! work.  That's good NEWS if I've ever heard it.

	Herman: Win Gaim has been around for more than a year now.. Time Flies.

	Nathan: {{Meta,}{Contact,Buddy},Person} support for all!  Also, SSL
	support for Jabber makes its debut.  More Jabber goodies next release.

	Christian: It's a good release. The main highlight really is
	Nathan's Contact support, which is just beautiful. My buddy list
	shrunk considerably. As Sean stated, MSN and Yahoo! work.  MSN
	does not support the new MSN buddy icons and stuff, unfortunately,
	but we'll see about 0.70.  There were a whole bunch of Perl fixes,
	so hopefully there will be less complaints directed to my code in
	that area ;) Among other new additions of mine are SSL support
	(both Mozilla NSS and GNUTLS), Plugin IPC (letting plugins talk to
	each other), and some visual niceties in the Accounts window.
	Ka-Hing Cheung put in animated smileys, which should please many.
	Yeah, good release. Just you wait until 0.70 though.

	Robot101: Hi mom. My patch isn't in this release. Watch for the next
	one.

	Mark: Metacontact support, yeah.  Right click on a dude and 
	select "Expand."

	Ethan: God bless the USA.

0.68 (09/01/2003):
	Rob: Wow. I am so incredibly tired.

	Sean: School starts tomorrow!  How fun!  I'll have more time to hack 
	gaim (isn't that supposed to be the reverse?)*

	*Some NEWS recycled from v0.10.0
	
	Nathan: I didn't do much for this release, except make Jabber
	registration work, and put in a slight tweak to make Gaim work a
	little better with jabberd2.  Next release you'll all see what I've
	been spending my time on, but for now enjoy the fruits of everyone
	else's labor.

	Mark: I've been really busy with other stuff, but I've spent my 
	Gaim-time on working towards a more formal translation process.  
	Hopefully this will result in Gaim shipping with more complete 
	translation files.  Also, all our awesome translators are mentioned 
	in the about window now.

	Christian: I've been really busy with this stuff. Gaim got a new
	signal architecture, which is just really cool. The old events system
	is gone. Now you connect a signal from a handle (which can be
	a plugin or whatever) to a function, and plugins can register their
	own functions, and other neat things. Oh yeah, and perl was rewritten.
	There's a new HOWTO in the Doxygen docs (make docs), but no API
	reference yet. Developers, look at the plugins/perl/common/*.xs files
	for now. I also wrote plugin dependencies, which will be more useful
	down the road. Gaim v0.69 is going to have the new MSN plugin that
	works with the latest MSN protocol. Please be patient for that, as
	we're getting a lot of MSN questions we answer over and over.

	Luke: Wow, I actually did something for this release besides commit
	translations! Well, sorta. I got permission to commit some patches 
	so gaim now has color support for yahoo, and you can fetch some 
	basic info on yahoo and msn users. Yay for people submitting patches!

0.67 (08/14/2003):

	Rob: I live in Georgia.  I don't care about blackouts.  We only
	have to deal with floods and tornadoes.

	Sean: Fortunately me for me, I live in the only place in New York
	that still has power tonight!  New features in 0.6@%f)*2.{\
	NO CARRIER

	Christian: I guess Sean couldn't be here to tell you about all the
	great new things. New stuff was done! It's simply amazing. Yeah. So,
	new IRC protocol plugin, tab text is greyed on events (like "So and
	so has signed off!"), protocol icons on tabs (thanks to Etan Reisner),
	some dialog rewrites.. Great stuff. Gaim's looking more teh perrty.
	My big "wow" thing is that the core and UI were split enough for me
	to remove the remaining UI code and make a patch, and libgaim was born,
	for experimental purposes. However, using it, I was able to make the
	second UI ever for Gaim - Gaim for Qtopia (Zaurus and iPaq PDAs).
	This is viewable at http://qpe-gaim.sf.net/ (shameless plug?). More
	UIs to come I hope! :) Exciting time in Gaim.

0.66 (07/18/2003):
	Rob: Oops!!!!  This reminds me of other silly things that we've
	done. I agree with what Herman is going to say. ;-)

	Sean: Man, 0.65 was so super lame and boring.  But 0.66?  WOW!
	This is the most incredible thing EVER.  We've done tons of work
	since 0.65, and I'm really proud of what we came out with.  Thanks
	to everyone who helped!

	Christian: Wow, I can't even begin to describe how long we've worked
	on this one. Monstrous release. Best ever! You won't even recognize
	it. If you've had account import problems, delete your accounts.xml
	and upgrade to 0.66. Just, wow.

	Herman: This is to make up for slipping off the two week release cycle.

	Luke: Okay, people, yes we did test 0.65 for bugs, but hey, some things
	slip through. This release makes up for that. This should fix the bugs 
	0.65 introduced, at least the ones that most of you would otherwise hit.

	Nathan: We are so smart.  S-M-R-T...I mean S-M-A-R-T.

0.65 (07/16/2003):
	Rob: Wooo! We're finally ready for 0.65.  Are you guys excited?  I
	haven't worked on anything in this release, either.  I've been
	working offline on a MacOSX UI.  No, you're not allowed to ask
	me when it will be ready.  If you ask me then I won't answer 
	you.  You've been warned! :-D

	Sean: Although I tend to go right here in the two slot in NEWS,
	we don't always commit in this order.  This is the third time I've
	rewritten this because the jerks below me keep commiting while I'm
	writing causing mass conflictination.  Grrr.  Stupid jerks.  Anyway,
	this is Gaim 0.65.  Like other Gaim releases, this allows you to 
	converse with people far away over the "Internet."  That's about it.
	It's really not that interesting.  In fact, I wouldn't even bother
	reading the other people's NEWS.  It's all boring.  There's some 
	crap about forest fires and fangs and claws.  It's really boring.
	Great, now Luke just committed NEWS causing more conflictination.
	I wouldn't bother reading his either.  Oh, and I don't want to thank
	Megan (Cae) or Kevin (SimGuy).  They're stupid jerks too.  Grrr...

	Mark: I actually did stuff for this release.  Go me.  I probably 
	shouldn't speak for all of us, but I'm going to anyway: We feel that 
	this release is one of Gaim's best.  It should be relatively bug 
	free, and the code is cleaner than ever, thanks to lots of work by 
	Christian and Nathan.  We had some help from a few civilians 
	finding and fixing bugs.  Thanks to Megan (Cae), Ka-Hing Cheung 
	(javabsp), and Kevin Stange (SimGuy) for their work.  Man, I was just 
	looking at Sean's NEWS entry for 0.64--that's talent.  Also, stay 
	in school.  Just say no.  Only you can prevent forest fires.

	Christian: This has been a great release. faceprint rocks, as he got
	things moving in the core/UI split by redoing preferences, which forced
	us to think about how things would be split. We now have XML
	preferences, accounts, pounces, and away messages. No more .gaimrc
	ugliness. The accounts and connection code now have new core/UI split
	APIs, and there is very little to do before our split is ready to be
	used. Rob and I are working off an experimental tarball of what will
	eventually be libgaim. He's working on a MacOS X UI (don't ask him
	about it, he'll ignore you) and I'm doing a Qtopia UI (you can ask
	about that, it's usable!). We added a new protocol, Trepia.
	Information about it can be found at http://www.trepia.com/. It's not
	complete, so don't send in bug reports about it not finding people in
	your local area, please. Oh, and lots of MSN bugs were fixed.
	Practically all the known ones. I feared 0.65 would be unstable due to
	our rewrites, I believe this is going to be one of the most stable
	releases we've had in awhile (knock on wood), thanks to Megan (Cae),
	who has done an amazing job at locating, categorizing and documenting
	the various bugs she has run into, and kevin (SimGuy). Stay tuned for
	upcoming releases. Neat things are coming, but if it has fangs and
	claws, curl into a ball. Or yell at it. I can't remember which is
	correct.

	Luke: Wow! Finally releasing 0.65! Christian, Nathan, and Mark have
	worked really hard for this release, all the credit goes to them.
	The new preferences are awesome, and there are more bugs fixed for 
	this release than in the last 3 or 4 releases. Your MSN should work
	reliably again, your preferences saved, your accounts resort, the 
	list goes on and on. A couple preferences, most notably your buddy
	list sorting preference won't be imported, but almost all of them 
	will be	and its probly a good idea for you to take a second look 
	through preferences again anyway, alot of you are starting to 
	forget that things are optional again. :-)

	Nathan: I think I did something for this release a while ago.  I've
	got a mailbox full of commit emails, and some have my name on them,
	so I must have done something, right?  Probably some minor jabber stuff,
	and lots of crazy bugfixes.  It was a team effort, I'd like to thank the
	academy, our producer Rob Flynn, and of course all the fans. You rock.

	Herman: I was told to write something.. so here it goes.  Windows users
	will be happy to know that they can now rearrange their Buddy Lists.  
	I finally got stuck into GTK+ code and fixed the bug in question (this 
	release will include a patched version of GTK+ 2.2.1).  I integrated 
	the WinGaim systray code into the docklet plugin bringing those nice 
	docklet features (i.e. Message queuing) to WinGaim.  Another major
	WinGaim change of note is that debug versions of all dlls can now be
	built, providing useful backtraces not only for gaim.dll but for the
	plugins as well.

0.64 (05/29/2003):
	Rob: I didn't do anything this release either.  We're under a crunch
	week at work.  Friday is the end of the crunch. Hooray!! Thanks for
	all of your hard work, guys :).

	Sean: Unlike every other time we say, "the next release will be loaded
	with cool new features, this time, we really mean it. In fact, they're
	already in CVS (don't use CVS).  The only obvious new feature for 0.64
	is buddy list sorting.  This has been much requested and can be set in
	the buddy list preferences.  You can sort by name, by status, and even
	by log file size--putting people you talk to most at the top.  Plugins
	can even easily add their own sorting methods.  It's all very cool.  I
	want to thank Luke and Ka-Hing for their initial work on it.  And yes,
	I did make my entire NEWS entry justified on purpose.

	Christian: I have a few new goodies in 0.64, but they're mostly
	back-end stuff that people like us care about. The things that most
	of you will like the most is that almost all of the reported MSN
	bugs were fixed. Users with an empty contact list can now login again.
	The friendly name bug is gone. E-mail notifications work again. Yay!
	We have some big changes in store for 0.65. Careful if you use CVS...
	Things will break. :)

	Mark: I never really have anything important to add.  I'd just like to 
	thank Jack Daniels for his exquisite bug reports.  And whiskey.

	Nathan: I don't think I did anything for this release.  I'm a bum.

0.63 (05/16/2003)
	Rob: Wow, so, what can I say? I've been rather AWOL for the past few
	releases.  However, that's okay.  Work has been pretty friggin hec-
	tic, so, that's my excuse.  Work is finally going to be slowing down
	some. I plan to be doing more Gaim work.  That makes me happy. That
	makes you happy.  That makes us all happy.  Now, I just need to
	finish rebuilding my car's engine.  Engine rebuilds put the FU in
	fun!

	Sean: Yay!  School is finally over.  I have to give tons of cherry-
	flavored props to everyone whose been helping out while I stayed away
	from Gaim to keep myself from failing again, especially Christian and
	Nathan.

	Luke: Okay, this is NOT a bug fix release, at least for those of you
	who use MSN. Christian put in a TON of effort rewritting the MSN prpl,
	mega props to him on this release. In other news, we have alot of bugs
	fixed, and a goodly number of the translations are more up to date 
	than they were in earlier releases. There are some other significant
	changes, but they are mostly backend stuff, yay for core/ui splits ;-)

	Christian: As Sean and Luke said, I did a tiny bit of work in this
	release. The MSN prpl was rewritten, and should now work better. It's
	compatible with the MSNP7 protocol that MSN v4.x uses. Unfortunately,
	MSNP9 is being worked on. Bah. Also, it has MSN Mobile support, so you
	can register your MSN account with http://mobile.msn.com/ and people
	can page your mobile device. You can also page other MSN Mobile users.
	Groups are now stored on server. Oh, and due to the nature of MSNP7,
	conversations are timed out after 5 minutes, so you'll unfortunately
	see a message indicating that. Sorry! I wrote experimental support
	for my own implementation of MSN buddy icons. You can set them in your
	account settings much like with AIM, and when you talk to other gaim
	users, they'll get your buddy icon. This will last for a few releases,
	until the buddy icon implementation in the upcoming MSNP9 protocol is
	figured out, and we have support for that. That'll be a couple months
	away at least. Also, we have a rewrite of the plugin interface, so
	rewrite your plugins! Things are going to get very cool from it. The
	debug API was core/UI split, and some enhancements were made to the
	debug window. I think that's all from me.  It's been a fun release.
	Stay tuned, I have some great things coming up!

	Nathan: It seems like 0.62 was forever and a day ago.  I had to look
	at the ChangeLog to remember what I did.  Apparently I made it so you
	can put chats in your buddy list.  And then I tweaked a bunch of stuff
	and fixed a bunch of crashes.  Then exams came, and then I went home
	for a week and left my laptop's power cable here at school, so I didn't
	get anything done.  Jabber will get all sorts of fun new stuff for
	the next release.  Really.  ;-)

0.62 (04/23/2003):
	Sean: This is just another standard bi-weekly Gaim release.  Nothing
	really interesting, but it has some good bugfixes.  Personally, I've
	been a bit removed from Gaim development lately what with school getting
	tough and stuff, but the rest of the guys have really been doing great
	work without me.  Thanks, guys.

	Christian: I can't remember what I did here.. Think I'll take a quick
	look at the ChangeLog.... Okay, guess I was useless. That's okay,
	though, because I have some really cool stuff going into 0.63. Plugin
	authors will hate me for it. A rewrite of the plugins interface! This is
	actually a Good Thing (TM). Anyhow, upgrade to this release, and tell
	your friends.  33 Gaim users can't be wrong!

	Luke: I didn't do much here besides the odd translation patch and a
	couple bug fix patches. This is primarily a bug fix release, and much
	needed at that. Didn't get a chance to write sorting code, work has been
	busy.  Hopeefully it will happen for 0.63.

	Mark: Gaim is coming along quite beautimously.  I'm going to eat 
	my Pop-tarts now.

	Nathan: oh dot sixty two.  There are a lot of bugs fixed in this
	release, and one major new feature.  Our Jabber plugin now supports
	XHTML-IM.  In plain english, this means that you can now format your
	jabber messages, and other people will see the formatting.  GtkIMHTML
	still needs some work to get it to parse valid XHTML-IM better, but that
	will come in time.  That time would come sooner if my CS prof accepted
	"I was hacking on Gaim" as a valid excuse for an extension ;-)

0.61 (04/07/2003):
	Rob: Nathan commited his news first.  However, I'm cooler so I'm putting
	my entry above his.  Yeah, so, there were some DnD issues with 0.60. I 
	blame it on the rain. It was falling, falling.  I blame it on the
	faucet. It drips all night.

	Sean: I committed my news after Rob.  I'm cooler than Nathan (by far)
	but not as cool as Rob.  So I go here.  Actually, I didn't do anything
	since 0.60 other than commit some other peoples patches.  The one from
	Dave Camp is cool.  How 'bout this snow?  Isn't that crazy?  Oh, and
	thanks to everyone who wished me a happy birthday.

	Nathan: You want frequent releases?  You got 'em ;-)  Chip wrote some
	cool new pounce stuff, and things shouldn't get weird when you drag
	groups and buddies around.  It's bad enough having 1 of some of my
	buddies on my list, I definitely don't need duplicates.  Being that I
	have class in the morning, I'll just raise my juice glass for this one.

	Christian: I'm not as cool as Rob, Sean, or Nathan, so I go down here.
	Well, among some of the fixes is my new buddy pounce code! This adds new
	buddy pounce types, core/ui splitifies the code, and makes the dialog
	box spiffy. Yay frequent releases! Erm, I can't think of anything else
	cool to say here. Have fun, everyone!

	Luke: Okay, i'm probly the least cool, so I'll go last. I committed a
	few patches from other people here, nothing earth shattering though. The
	biggest thing in this release is the group re-ordering bug fix, having
	that fixed will make for fewwer questions. Get used to using releases
	people, we want to use cvs for actual development :-).

	Mark: I didn't want to write any news without actually having done 
	anything, so I fixed a meaningless compile warning.  Boo-yeah.

	Sean: Luke can't spell "fewer".  How un-cool is that?

0.60 (04/04/2003):
	Rob: Wow. So, it has been a really long time since we started the
	gtk2 fork. It's finally ready for public consumption. Sean is about
	to go out and buy a case of beer.  My roommate is downstairs right
	now pouring me a shot of his choice.  Everyone, raise your beers if
	you've got them.  It's been a cool almost 10-months of development.
	I hope you all enjoy. Drink'em if you got'em!

	Sean: I'm writing this 3 minutes before my 21st birthday.  Nobody can
	believe we're finally ready to relase 0.60.  Many thanks to everyone
	who helped out; I'm convinced that Gaim 0.60 is the best IM client to
	date (only to be bested by 0.61).  There's WAY too much stuff to mention.
	Even the ChangeLog is somewhat incomplete.  Yay, I'm 21 now!  Everyone
	enjoy! :)

	Nathan:  Happy birthday Sean!  Rob decided to let me start cleaning up
	after everyone, so here I am.  "sexy" is the only word that can be used
	to describe 0.60.  Prepare to be shocked and amazed.  /me raises his
	(shot) glass ;-)

	Christian: Geeeeeze this took a long time. Worth it though! Personally,
	I thought we'd all just give up on releases altogether and tell
	everybody just to grab CVS. I'm pretty happy with this release. I was
	able to contribute quite a bit to it. Makes me feel proud to be a gaim
	developer!  I'm really looking forward to the future releases. I have
	some neat stuff planned. Yay, I'm still 19! Mmmm, Sierra Mist. Make me a
	sammich!

	Mark: Whoops, I started drinking a little earlier than I was supposed 
	to.  I guess I missed the memo.  Hmm, I ate at a restaurant somewhere, 
	I think it was at Snowshoe, and the menu had "sammiches" on it.  It was 
	pretty sweet.  I'd like to give a shout out to all the Gaim 
	devizelopers for rizocking the hizzy the past few months.  Word.


0.59 (06/24/2002):
	Rob: I guess Sean is busy at home or something and Jim is asleep.
	I'm very tired but it's time for a release.  Enjoy.  :)
	SORRY FOR THE DELAY. :(

	Sean: It's been a long time since our last release, and for no 
	good reason either.  Rob and I just haven't been able to get together 
	to do it.  But now we have.  Aside from some Jabber changes and some 
	crucial MSN fixes, most of this release's changes are transparent, 
	but none-the-less important.  Well get some better changes when my 
	computer works again, you have my word*

	*My word is worthless.


0.58 (05/13/2002):
	Rob: Yeah, so, my computer has been bad which is why the release
	didn't go out on time. Oh well.  I would like to welcome
	Jim Seymour aboard the development team.  He's going to be taking
	over the work on our Jabber code as well as doing various other
	nit picking. He likes to pick nits, nats, and umm, knots, I think.

	Sean: This release has a long ChangeLog.  Higlights include an
	important security fix for MSN and a few nice new features.
	Not *much* cooler than 0.57--but we're making progress ;)

	Jim: Hmmm... Rob said I have to say *something*, so here it is:
	Rob's a mango.

0.57 (04/25/2002):
	Rob: Not too much in this release, as Sean said below. (This is
	what happens when the bottom person goes first.) New translation,
	a few fixes, secure msn hotmail logins, blah blah blah. As Sean
	said, the next release will be cooler. If only you could read
	our minds ;-).

	Sean: Nothing too special here, but a critical Yahoo fix that
	ensures Yahoo! will work when they discontinue the old protocol
	all the other 3rd party clients are using.  Next release will be
	cooler, I promise.

0.56 (04/11/2002):
	Rob: Well, what do you know. I have another headache. I always have
	these damned headaches. I got pissed off with the way GtkTree looks.
	I wanted to move to using GtkCTree. I think they're pretty.
	Unfortunately, GtkCTree sucks. After a little digging through
	the code, I managed to molest GtkTree into looking like
	GtkCTree. Thanks to everyone that helped track down that one
	annoying style problem.

	Sean: Hello.  This is another minor release while Rob and I finish 
	up on some bigger projects.  We're reworking a lot of the UI to make 
	it easier to use, nicer looking, and more compatible with gtk2.  
	I've also been trying to bring the Yahoo plugin up to date, so it 
	will work for Indian users and avoid a potential problem in the near 
	future.

0.55 (03/29/2002):
	Rob: 0.55 is here. I've been away for a few days on business. Sean
	has been on Spring Break. Therefore, this release is mostly a patch
	release. It does fix some bugs and makes a few thing slightly cooler,
	so it's better in that aspect, I suppose.  Enjoy.

	Sean: This is mostly a bugfix release.  I'm on Spring Break, not
	doing any coding at all.  But lots of people sent in great patches
	anyway.  Thanks guys!

0.54 (03/14/2002):
	Rob: Well, here we are. 0.54. We got a lot of fun things in this
	release. Better working SSI, Image sending, protocol specific
	smiley faces, and a whole lot of triscuits. *gobble*

	Sean: We fixed a lot of bugs in this one, and probably introduced
	a bunch too. ;)  We were both really busy, and did all the coding
	late at night when we were tired, so if something isn't working, 
	it's probably just tired code.  Enjoy the triscuits!

0.53 (02/28/2002):
	Rob: Well, we missed yesterday's release. That's Okay, I head a
	nasty headache. You can all just deal. ;-)


	Sean: Neat Goodies!  Whee!!  Oscar got a lot of great additions.
	It can do Screen Name formatting, it can save and store your buddy
	list on the server, it can do typing notifications in Direct
	Connections, and yes, it can receive IM Images!  Sending images will
	be added in the next release.  MSN and Yahoo! can do typing 
	notification too.  Hooray!


0.52 (02/17/2002):
	Rob: Well, after a long delay we're finally ready for another release. 
	I finally got settled into my new apartment, the new job is going 
	well, and I finally have internet connectivity again. You can expect 
	us to be back on our usually bi-monthly schedule.  Enjoy these fixen, 
	as they resolve a few connectivity issues. :-)

	Sean: It looks like things are back on track now.  Eric left which is 
	sad.  He's done so much for Gaim, and I know we're all thankful.  
	Thanks Eric!  I'll be stepping in and do more development, but I can 
	never replace Eric.  This release fixes a long-standing problem in 
	MSN.  If you've gotten errors when trying to connect to MSN, you want 
	this release.  If you've suddenly found yourself unable to connect to 
	Yahoo!, you want this release too.  The "neat goodies" will be in the 
	next release ;)

	Rob: Operation Evil does not exist! ;-)


0.51 (01/24/2002):
	Rob: Well, here we go. I FINALLY got around to making a release
	after over a month, Sorry for the delay, all. Things got really
	hectic around the gaim house hold.  This release isn't as complete
	as I had hoped, but I promised to get something out. There's some
	neat goodies in mind for the next release, right Sean? :-)


0.50 (12/13/2001):
	Rob: I am tired. Tonight was weird. Bleh!!!!

	Eric: I second that.

0.49 (11/29/2001):
	Rob: *still mamboing*
	
	Whew! That was a bad little mambo.  I hope everyone had a nice
	little Holiday, if you celebrate. If not, then I hope you had
	a sucky weekend. :-D. 

	Oh, lots of cheese for everyone!! (Beware the duffle)

	It's getting cloudy. I think it's going to storm somethin'
	fierce. That's my southern talk. Do you like it? 

	Eric: I want to be like you.

	Do the cha cha cha!

0.48 (11/18/2001):
	Rob: Hi! It's 4:12am! I'm watching The Simpsons. :). 
	Oh boy, sleep! That's where I'm a viking! :) There's not
	too much for me to say in this release. I'd just like to
	thank Eric for his hard work. :)

	Eric: Everybody mambo!

0.47 (11/01/2001):
	Rob: Hi. Gaim v0.47 has been released, as you should already
	know. I hope all of you had a nice little halloween. There are
	quite a number of changes in this release. There are a few too
	many to list here, so I will redirect you to ye olde ChangeLog.

	Eric: Remember back in the day when TOC was the only protocol
	Gaim could use? Remember the login window from back then? Back
	before Gaim had perl or plugins or multiple connections or
	10 different protocols. Things have changed so much since then.
	Many more changes in this release as well. All good things.
	Don't forget to talk to SmarterChild.
	
0.46 (10/18/2001):
	Rob: Hey guys! The smores were great! I really enjoyed meeting
	up with all of you guys and singing campfire songs. It was 
	really awesome.  Thanks for the beer, too. Next time, it's on me.
	
	This release has quite the number of bug fixes. I won't bother
	going into detail here. Just ust it, love it, live it - SEGA!

	Eric: Lots of fixes. Things compile well now. ICQ has stopped
	crashing on PPC and Sparc. If you know someone who isn't using
	Gaim because it was unstable, please get them to try this
	version. It's much better, I promise.

0.45 (10/04/2001):
	Eric: Well, it seems that the time has come for yet another
	release. There are several yummy additions in this release, and
	quite a few useful bugfixes as well. Unfortunately it seems that
	Rob is currently unavailable; he joins us in spirit. He'll be
	joining us later for a group sing-along and smores by the
	campfire. But for now, you'll need to keep yourselves occupied
	with 0.45. And remember, a happy hacker is a pimpin' penguin.

0.44 (09/20/2001):
	Rob: Another release has come upon us. There were actually quite
	a number of things in ye old ChangeLog for this release. I don't
	feel like talking about them here, so you can read about them
	in ... you guessed it .. the ChangeLog.  Oh, and if you're 
	wondering about setting buddy icons, wait til 0.45 or 
	use CVS shortly after this release. ;-)

	Eric: You should all be using CVS anyway. This has become the
	slogan in our IRC room, #gaim on irc.openprojects.net. The IRC
	plugin got lots of updates (mostly because I felt bad about using
	X-Chat for IRC when gaim supposedly had an IRC plugin), so you
	should load the plugin and join us. :)

0.43 (09/06/2001):

	Rob: Well, I knew that the day would eventually come. I just didn't
	expect it to be so soon. ;-).  Yes, that's right, Eric and I finally
	got sick of all of the pre releases.  We didn't want to make this
	release an official 0.11.0. We thought that it would cause a lot
	of confusion. We didn't want to continue our trend of prereleases
	either. So, since gaim was first released officially, there
	have been 42 releases.  This is number 43, hence the 0.43 version
	number.  We're going to stick with this trend from now on. :-).

	Eric: We're also going to be starting a release early, release
	often trend, that hopefully we'll stick to this time. Hopefully
	we'll be putting out a new release every two weeks or so. You
	should all be using CVS anyway :) And as always, don't forget to
	report bugs! Anyway, since there's only been 9 days since the
	last release not much has changed. A bug-fix release and a version
	change mostly :)

0.11.0-pre15 (08/28/2001):
	Eric: This isn't a real release. Really. It's just a quick thing
	because pre14 doesn't cut it for some people. Also not counting
	the month break that I took it's been a month since the last
	release, so it's about time. You should all be using CVS anyway.
	Instructions are at http://gaim.sourceforge.net/cvs.shmtl. And
	don't forget to report bugs! http://gaim.sourceforge.net/bug.php3.

	Rob: Hey guys.  I've been rather inactive as well. It's a long
	story, but essentially, my company layed off a bunch of people,
	myself included, due to poor management.  I've taken a new
	job which required moving across the country.  I'm finally back
	online.  Once I manage to actually get a desk at home I'll be
	able to code with out infliciting intense pain upon my lower
	back and neck.  So, basically, we were inactive, but not dead.

	Also, just to keep you all updated, the AOL battle is still
	in progress.  Our lawyers are still in negotiation with thiers.
	We'll keep you updated with what happens.

0.11.0-pre14 (06/17/2001):
	Eric: Wee. Lots of fun things. BIG bug fix release. I did a lot of
	stupid things in the last one, hehe. You all forgive me though,
	right?

	Reality is always controlled by the people who are most insane.
	Remember that. It's a great Scott Adams quote.

	Rob: I feel naughty. I should have released this a lot earlier
	in the day.  I have a problem though. I started cooking, invited
	a couple friends over for dinner and then took a walk to a
	24hr doughnut shop where I sat outside and talked about
	random stuff.  Oh well, at least it's still before the 18th.

	Enjoy this release guys! :-)


0.11.0-pre13 (06/06/2001):
	Rob: \O.  Howdy doodie!  This release isn't coming too far behind
	the previous release but hey, what can ya say, there were a couple
	of good fixes in this one.  Jabber & IRC can set / view the topics
	of chat rooms now, napster doesnt crash on bad login names and
	passwords, and the man page got a big update.  

	Well, that's about all, folks.  Next release, I hope to try to get
	group MSN chat support added as well as DCC support in the IRC 
	plugin. 

	Peace!

	Eric: I apologize if any of you had to restart your X server because
	of me. This release won't make you have to do that, I promise. There
	were a couple other minor fixes with the buddy icon stuff, it still
	has a way to go but at least it's better than it was before. Oh yeah,
	and Oscar is able to sign on again.

0.11.0-pre12 (05/29/2001):
	Rob: Hi!  O/.  My girlfriend was visiting me so I've been busy being
	unavailable online.  Hooray.

	There have been a lot of good changes in this release.  Some improved
	dialogs, some updates to IRC and MSN, as well as a nifty little thing
	that Eric did that I'll let him tell you about.  

	Oh yeah, I also got food poisoned by bad eggs.  Ugh!

	Eric: Every protocol except TOC has been improved since the last
	release. All of them except Zephyr and ICQ now use the same proxy
	options, which you can set in the preferences. ICQ can use them if
	you set it to Socks5 though.

	There are a bunch of other good additions and fixes for each
	protocol which you can read about in the ChangeLog. And, there's one
	super cool feature that everyone seems to be asking for: Buddy Icons.
	Right now you can only receive them and only in Oscar, but hey, they're
	there.

	So that's it. Have fun with it :)

0.11.0-pre11 (04/30/2001):
	Rob: I bought a big carton of juice today.  It is now 50% empty.
	A lot of the plugins got some new options and/or improvements. I
	have a headache right now, though, so I won't say much.  I'll let
	Eric talk :)

	Eric: I uh. I bought 72 cans of soda yesterday. It only cost $15
	or so. I figure I'll be through it in less than two weeks. A
	dollar a day on soda isn't so bad. For the fourth release in a row,
	Oscar is fixed. Isn't that exciting. Judging from history I'd say
	that it won't stay fixed long; but judging from what I know has
	changed, we shouldn't have any more troubles.

	Rob: --. .- .. -- /  .. ... /  --. .-. . .- - --..-- /  --. .- .. -- /  
	     .. ... / --. --- --- -.. .-.-.-  

	I don't have a headache anymore!  Hooray! Eric got a good deal on those
	drinks.  I bought some bananas.  They're very green.  Oh, and I cooked
	a steak last night.  It was 16 oz.  It was good.  

0.11.0-pre10 (04/13/2001):
	Rob: EEP! It's Friday the 13th!!!  I think I fixed a few buggies
	in MSN and then added some new features to IRC.  I have a headache
	right now, though, so I won't talk much.  I think I'm going to go
	to sleep.  Next release, I should have a good bit more done on
	IRC and will have made Napster more stable.  Have fun!!

	Eric: There's a new protocol plugin, Zephyr. Don't use it! unless
	you know what Zephyr is, and have zhm set up correctly. Also there
	were a lot of other good bugfixes (like registering for Jabber
	accounts!) and a few neat features. In this release, Oscar is also
	working, but we'll see how long that lasts, eh?

0.11.0-pre9 (03/26/2001):
	Rob: Well, looks AOL was doing something naughty earlier this
	morning.  Thanks to a very nice guy named Adam Fritzler (you
	all know him from libfaim) we're now back online.  Thanks,
	Adam.  I'll buy you a drink sometime :-).  

0.11.0-pre8 (03/23/2001):
	Eric: Oo wow :) So I guess the big news is that this release should
	help you avoid the battle between Jabber and AOL. Most protocols
	got a few good bugfixes; thanks to people who pointed them out :).
	Hopefully for the next release I'll make it so you can register a
	jabber.org account, and then you can support Jabber using Gaim.
	I think (I *think*) Oscar blocking is working now. Haha, get it?
	Oscar blocking? It took me a while to get it, too. But no, really,
	I think that the permit/deny list in Oscar might be working.

	Rob: MSN got some fixes and should be really stable now.  It had 
	a little 100% CPU eating bug but that's taken care of now.  Next
	on my list of repairs is the napster plugin.  It works -- sorta --
	sometimes.  Heh.   As all of you probably know already, our Oscar
	support was broken yesterday.  There's a little battle going on
	between AOL and Jabber and we caught a bullet during the crossfire.
	I think I just won the award for the most cliches used in one
	paragraph, as a matter of fact. ;-). 

	** Good luck to the Jabber guys in getting this resolved **


0.11.0-pre7 (03/16/2001):
	Rob: Hey! I finally rewrote the MSN plugin.  Sorry, I'm just 
	a lazy code whore sometimes, heheh.  It pretty much has the same
	functionality as before with the exception of instability.  I
	didn't really like that feature very much so I removed it.  I hope
	you guys don't mind too terribly much ;-). 

	Eric: In this week's installment of gaim you'll find a new Yahoo!
	library and an option to have all conversations in one window,
	in addition to numerous bug fixes and other improvements. Don't
	forget to send us your feedback. If there's something you want
	added, changed, or fixed, head over to our SourceForge page at
	http://sourceforge.net/projects/gaim/ and tells us about it.


0.11.0-pre6 (03/06/2001):
	Eric: Yay! I get to go first!

	The biggest change in this release is the TODO file. Lots of things
	got added. There's going to be a lot of prereleases. Please help.
	Other than that it's mostly just a lot of bugfixes. Oscar got a few
	new features. Head on over to http://sourceforge.net/projects/gaim
	and tell us what you'd like to see in gaim. We've gotten a lot of
	great requests so far, thanks.

	I think I like releasing every week.

	Rob: I've been bad so Eric got to go first.  The biggest change
	In this release is the NEWS file.  It's the only thing I contributed
	to!  heh, just kidding.  This is a bug fix release, as Eric said.
	Next release will contain my newly rewritten MSN plugin.  You guys
	should be happy with it :).  

	Oh yeah, TUCAN rocks :)  Oh yeah, Eric rocks too. 


0.11.0-pre5 (02/26/2001):
	Rob: Yeah, I promise this is the last pre-release :-D.  That seems
	to be a pretty common saying around here, huh?  Well, I must first
	appologize.  The protocols that I was working on really should be
	much more developed at this point -- they should be completed,
	actually.  Unfortunately, my real life job (yes, I have one hehe) got
	a little too busy and ate up all of my free time.  I promise that
	things will get better now :).  

	Eric: I don't promise that this is the last pre-release. :) But
	hopefully releases can start coming more often than once every two
	months. I don't really have much else to say. It's been a slow
	couple of months.

	Rob: I promise to hack gaim again.  Please don't hate me.

0.11.0-pre4:
	Rob: HOORAY FOR DISNEYLAND!

	Eric: One more prerelease. I'm actually starting to think these
	prereleases are a good idea; a lot of people reported a lot of
	bugs in pre3 and most of them are fixed now. Also, it helps with
	the whole release early-release often philosophy.

	The big news in this prerelease is two more protocols: Jabber and
	Napster. Both of them don't have any of the features that make
	these services cool, yet. You can't use the transports in Jabber
	and you can't download file in Napster. But you will be able to,
	soon :)

	Rob and I are going on vacation starting today until after New
	Year's, which is a lot of the reason we wanted to get this release
	out; it's much improved over pre3. Happy Holidays everyone.

0.11.0-pre3 (12/15/2000):
	Rob: Well, I hadn't initially planned on an 0.11.0pre3 but it 
	looks like it was needed.  That's not necessarially a bad thing,
	mind you.  It just means you get to see more goodies!  
	
	This release includes some other fun features.  See the ChangeLog
	for more information.  Also found in this wonderful release is
	an MSN plugin.  For all of you who have been holding onto Windows
	simply because you have friends on MSN Messenger that you don't want
	to leave, this plugin is for you! :) 

	Guys, make sure you send us bug reports; preferably on the 
	SourceForge bug report forum at 
	http://www.sourceforge.net/projects/gaim/.  This will allow both
	Eric and I to handle the bugs and will prevent either one of us
	from losing the bug reports that are sent via AIM :-)

	Eric: Hey everybody, Rob and I really want to hear what you guys want
	to see in gaim. Head over to http://sourceforge.net/projects/gaim and
	leave a message in the Open Discussion forum. We've gotten a lot of
	good ideas so far (most of them didn't make it into this release,
	unfortunately).

	If any of you want to test out your mad coding skills, I can think of
	a few projects that would be incredibly useful. Send me or Rob an IM
	and we'll let you know how you can help. And don't forget to read the
	HACKING file to see how gaim's put together.

	This is hopefully going to be the last prerelease; now that all the
	protocols that we're going to be doing for 0.11.0 are available it's
	mostly just going to be hacking on them and getting them in usable
	condition before the final release. Don't forget to send us bug
	reports ;)

0.11.0-pre2 (12/04/2000):
	Rob: I messed up.  Oh well, it's fixed.

0.11.0-pre1 (12/03/2000):
	Rob: Hey guys!  Guess what!?  Yup, you're correct!  It's the pre1 
	release  of 0.11.0. We have all sorts of goodies in this release!  
	Check out the  ChangeLog file.  As always if you find any bugs, 
	please report them on www.sourceforge.net/projects/gaim/
	
	You may find several small bugs as this is still a prerelease.  

	You may want to note that my IRC plugin does not have full 
	functionality as of yet.  All of the important / commands will be 
	added before the final release. Also, if someone could send me 
	some good buddylist pixmaps for the irc plugin then I'd much 
	appreciate it.  Thanks to everyone who made this new release possible!

	If you have any ideas, comments, or suggestions, please let us know 
	either by e-mail or via the source forge message board at the URL 
	above. :)


	Eric: So what was Yay! For Gaim!? Yay was the codename for the 
	Yahoo plugin. The whole point of all of these changes was I wanted to 
	make a proof-of-concept plugin that would let Gaim sign into Yahoo. It 
	turned out to be pretty much impossible with the old code. So,
	Rob and I hacked gaim so we could do just that. There's now a whole new 
	class of plugins, Protocol Plugins, that let users dynamically add new 
	protocols to Gaim. Just load the plugin, and create a new account that 
	uses that protocol, and you're set! Yay! (Oscar and TOC are both still 
	static. Gaim is, after all, primarily an AIM client.)

	Lots of people have been very generous and contributed a lot of 
	time and  effort to writing some really nice patches for gaim since 
	the last release. To all of you, a big thanks.

0.10.3 (10/09/2000):
	Rob: I am dumb.
	Eric: I am not dumb.
	
0.10.2 (10/07/2000):
	Rob: What do you want me to say for yours?
	Eric: What happened since the last release?
	Rob: You got DSL.
	Eric: Oh yeah, I'm more available now.
	Rob: On a more serious note, this is just a quick release
	to hold everyone over.  Look for some very awesome things
	coming in the next version.  I can't say what, just yet,
	but what I can say is, Yay! For Gaim!

0.10.1 (09/15/2000):

	Rob: Hi Hi Hi!  Yet another gaim release pushed out the door
	for you guys.  I hope you all enjoy it.  There was a few minor
	issues cleared up in this version as well as the repair of
	OSCAR support.  Hopefully we won't run into the same problem
	as before.  Oh well ;-).  There's also a few small extra goodies
	in here for you guys just check out the Change Log.  I hope you all
	enjoy and take care! 

	Eric: Wanna know what the Oscar problem was? You'll laugh. 2 bytes.
	The fix was changing 0x07da to 0x0686. Anyway, aside from the fix
	for that, there are a couple other good things. Beware of DSL nazis.
	They won't give you service until 6 weeks after you order it. So um,
	yeah.

0.10.0 (09/11/2000):
	Rob: Well peoples, I know that it's been a while since our
	last release.  Here we go.  Some brand spankin' new interfaces
	for you guys to oogle at.  I hope you all enjoy it.  Hopefully
	our next release won't take as long to finish up.  Real life
	kind of crept up on Eric and I and took up a lot of our times.
	Life sucks that way sometimes.  Anyways, we're back and all
	is well.  Thanks for hanging in there guys and we hope
	you enjoy it! 

	Eric: LWE was so cool. Rob and I met up there, we had a blast. But I
	only got to go for one day and Rob got to go for three. Lucky bastard.
	It's been so long since the last release that I don't even remember
	what's changed. But all of it is good :) Like Rob said, all kinds of
	new UI stuff. I think there are some new features in there too. Now
	I'm headed back to school so I'll have more time to hack gaim (isn't
	that supposed to be the reverse?), just as soon as I get my internet
	connection back >:-/ .

	Rob: Oh yeah, some of our pixmaps may need a little work.  We took
	a lot of them from the Gnome Stock icons.  If anyone could do some
	custom ones that stay within the 24x24 boundary and keep the same
	idea and feel as the gnome icons then we would be more than happy
	to use them.  Thanks much!! Viva la LWE.
 

0.9.20 (07/14/2000):
	Rob: Well, guys, I hope you enjoy this version.  I've done quite a bit
	of work to the user interface.  It's still not in the state that I
	would like it to be, though.  Over the next few versions you will
	notice a few more interface changes as we try to bring a more
	professional look to Gaim.  As always, we will stay true to our
	pimpin' penguin atittude. 

	Eric: While Rob's been busy making things pretty, I've been busy
	making things work :). The chat and IM windows got merged, which
	means that they both have the same features (notably, IM has /me
	and chat has font/color dialogs and smileys). Also smileys should
	work better in general now (thanks fflew).
	
	Rob: By the way, what Eric is saying is that he's smart and I'm
	not and that he does all of the work and I sit on my butt all
	day and claim to do work.  WOOO!  Just kidding, brother :-P


0.9.19 (06/09/2000):
	Rob: PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA 
	PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA 
	PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA PLA  

	All of that nonsense aside, there are a few things that DIDN'T happen
	in this version of gaim.  The user interface changes will wait until
	the 0.9.20 release.  We've decided to turn 0.9.19 into a "new feature
	and major bug fix" release.  All/Most major bugs should be worked out
	now.  We're sorry about the problem of segfaulting when your buddylist
	stored on the server was null.  Oops! We won't let it happen again,
	we promise.

	Eric: Lots of good changes in this one, including locale support. Chat
	had a lot of things done to it, but it's still not finished. The UI
	didn't get the overhaul we were planning, but we wanted to get a few
	bugfixes out.

	Lemme say something about reporting bugs. Please do. Please try to give
	as much information as you can. But regardless of how much information
	you give, please be POLITE. If you tell us our software is crap then
	we're probably not going to respond well.
	
	Rob: Before I close up and say goodnight, I'd like to say that I 
	agree with Eric.  Reporting problems and/or helpful criticism in
	a polite manner always yields the best results.  Peace all, and 
	happy hacking.

0.9.18 (06/02/2000):
	Rob: Talk about release early, release often - sheesh!  We're going
	insane.  Ya know, I'm not too happy with the Gaim UI.  I dont know
	how the rest of you feel but it's time for a nice overhaul.  In the
	next few days I'll be sitting down with some of my friends and coming
	up with an improved interface.  I hope you all enjoy it.  It'll
	include better looking dialogs, icons, sounds (hopefully lol), etc.

	And -- for your random silly message of the day --

	"Beans and Franks, Beans and Franks, Wine And Beer, Have No Fear!
	I can sing! I can dance! I have a penguin in my pants!"

	- Rob Flynn after not having enough sleep.

	Eric: I've had less sleep than Rob, I can guarantee you that. There's
	actually a lot going on in this release, despite 2 releases 2 days ago.
	Don't ask me how; I think the elves had something to do with it.

	Oscar support is almost to the point where I'm considering removing
	the 'experimental' label from configure. For those of you brave enough
	to try it, I'd like feedback. (And if you happen to write a patch to
	fix some of the stuff that would be really cool too.) Hopefully for the
	next release, in addition to the cool new UI, Gaim/Faim will be able to
	do nearly everything Gaim/TOC can do. (Big things coming in 0.9.19, I
	can feel it....)

	And just remember, you *can* have too many gummi candies. Especially if
	you eat nearly a whole kilo of them. Believe me. I know. But the gummi
	cherries are damn good.

0.9.17 (05/31/2000):
	Rob: I am an e-mail fiend!
	(after receiving 60 emails within a 5 minute period about a problem
	and responding to all of them immediately)

	I am stupid.

	Eric: Heh heh. 2 releases in one day. I'm impressed. Maybe one of these
times we'll actually get some of it right ;) Anyway, yeah. Just bug fixes in
this one.

	Rob: Yeah, we wouldn't be ourselves if we released it once and got it
	right, would we? :-)

0.9.16:
	Rob: Blah Blah Blah.

	Eric: Looks like Rob didn't have much to say, so I'll write something
instead :)

	There's a few good things in this release, the most important of them
being: Better proxy support, of course. Oh yeah, and you can sign on now,
so that's a good thing too. There's a few more good things going on in this
release, so check out the ChangeLog. 

	Play nicely, and we'll keep hacking away at it.

	Rob: Go Watch `Road Trip'. 

0.9.15:
	Hey boy's and girls.  There's not much to say here this time.
We're loving Southern California, the new job's going great.  We just
got our company website up and the product development is going pretty
smooth.  Life's pretty sweet now.  

	We've hacked up all kinds of goodies for you in 0.9.15.  There's
some file transfer (receive) support for those of you who have been
wanting it for a while. There's some other misc. goodies tossed in as
well.  Enjoy!! Oh yeah, we need a new website.  Come up with a sweet
design and get in touch with me.  The current site is at:
http://www.marko.net/gaim

Thanks much!


0.9.14:
	Well, there's a few random hacks and fixes in here, along with
a little suprise.  You guessed it, kiddos, support for plugins!  Happy
hacking!

0.9.13:
	Not much to say for this release.  Bug fixes, That's all.  Look
for the goodies I promised in 0.9.13 to appear in 0.9.14 which should be
released very soon now.  

	By the way, our CVS is now hosted over at source forge.  Go check
it out at http://www.sourceforge.net.  Please check there before submitting
any bug reports (You can read our CVS comments to see if we have fixed any
problems).

0.9.12:
	Well guys, looks like we got some nifty things in this version.
TrueType Fonts are supported for those XFSTT buffs out there (or whatever
else you use).  A crap load of those plaguing memory leaks have FINALLY been
fixed.  My brother, Jeramey, and a new friend Peter Teichan helped stomp
those babies out.  A rad guy by the name of Eric Warmenhoven has been
really sweet lately and has all but rewritten the Gnome Applet support :).
He submitted patch after patch.  I finally got annoyed with him (just kidding bud)
and gave him CVS access.  Look for Gnome Applet support in Gaim to start improving.
That's about all for now.  I wanted to get this release out there.  File Receive
support will be in 0.9.13 which is due out soon.
	
0.9.11:
	Jeramey got a new Comfy Chair! Its very very comfy!  Whee!
Jim also had a little hyper-drunken moment and started hacking away at
a new configuration format for Gaim.  Looks like we're running .gaimrc
version 1 now.  Gotta love it.  I got bored and hacked in a couple font
properties that will, in time, contain more features.  That's about it
for this version -- cept for that memory leak we fixed.  Shush! We're
not plumbers! -- rob

** Extra special update **

Well guys, it looks like we all stopped working on gaim, moved to California,
and took up a new job.  Don't worry though, those beach bums out here havent
worn off on us yet.  I've decided to pick up the Gaim torch myself and continue
development ont he prohect.  Hopefully we wont have any more five month braks in
the project.  Sorry about that, guys :)

0.9.10: 
	Umm.  Dont ask.  Silly memory leak.  For those of you who
wondered, you were losing about 256 bytes every 25 seconds for each
person you have on your contact list.  Make fun of us.  Better yet ..
Send us beer.  We'll do better :)

0.9.9:
	Welp, All of you boys and girls who run Mandrake and have some
problems with Gaim working properly, please check out the FAQ file.  It 
contains a nice fix submitted by one of our users.  I hope this works for
you guys!
	Jim appears to have intoxicated himself.  This is, as always, a
Good Thing (tm).  His late-night adventure with the liquid-bread food group
lead to the birth of a nice little feature called `The Lag-O-Meter'.  Dont
ask, just try it out :).  It is pretty pointless if you have a super-fast
connection but if you are a modem user, like many of us are, then try it out.
	There's also some idle preferences and some other little random
bug fixes.  Check'em out yo :)

0.9.8:
	Get Along Lil' Doggies.  Heh.  Looks like we have yet another new
version of gaim for you guys to play with.  Be gentle now, it has a few
new fetures.  The HTML widget is now more robust and we have *da da da* 
HTTP proxy support.  
	Oh By The Way, Do not pay too much attention to what we are doing
with this release.  We are all a little bit happy tonight.  You must love
life.  This is a special release of gaim.  We will be releasing some wonderful
photographs soon .. or perhaps if we get the bloody webcam working then we
will take a couple of quick snapshots.
	Looks like the Gaim developers convention (cool name huh) that we
had this weekend in Auburn, AL went wonderfully :).  yum yum yum. Hahahah. Oh
by the way.  Beware of insecure rednecks in the deli.  Bad things.
	In (non)related news, Jeramey could not successfully slaughter the
one pound hamburger that he ordered.  (I think he could have done it but he
wasn't feeling very well at the time).
	Oh Yes, New Logo Too :) You likes? Thanks, Naru!
	Just a little side-note: it looks like we didnt make the release that
we had expected during the Gaim Convention.  Maybe we partied too much? I am
not sure.  I remember watching the sun rise before I went to bed, though.
Oh well.  Here's your release!  Enjoy!
	By The Way, we have uploaded our party pictures to a website.
http://www.dorky.net/gaim/party/  They are nothing spectacular but I hope you
enjoy them! :).

0.9.7:
	Well, boys and girls, it's that time again!  Yup, time for the good
release fairy to come bless us with her infinite wisdom and divine presence.
Umm, yeah, something like that.  Anyways, this release has several little
"bad" network fixes (as Jim likes to say) and a couple touch-ups to a few
other features.  It also features preliminary oscar support.  Thanks to Jim
and Adam ("the libfaim guy")  hehe :)  We have also corrected a problem with
gaim not wainting to correctly save your password if you have an underscore
in it.  Thanks to w1za7d for pointing out the underscore problem.  ' and \
have also been fixed in passwords. :o) 

0.9.6:
	Sorry about the little segfaulting bugs in the past release.  Rob
is stupid. :).  Anyways, they have been patched up and a couple new features
have been added.  I hope you guys enjoy.

0.9.5:
	Well we added a myriad of new features to this release. (A lot of
small buggie fixes too.)  If you need a detailed list just check out the
ChangeLog.  We now have a new webpage design and have added a FAQ to the
distribution.  Before coming to us with any problems please take a quick
look through the FAQ to make sure we havent already covered your question.
	Also, thanks to our beloved Web Monkey, FlynOrange, we have all
learned the true power of foam weapons, slinkies, and whoopie cushions.  Hmm
gotta love those pranks, eh?

0.8.0:
	Well, just starting the NEWS file.  I'll try to remember what's new
from the last version.  Hmmm.  BIG code reorg.  Import/export, buddy pounce
among the major new features.  Autoconf script too, which is a big win.
Apologies to those who submitted patches which haven't made it in.. I
promise, the next version!  This code reorg took up a lot of my time, and I
want to get it out there.  

